The first track Right Next Door to Hell is a bit off to my ear. All the essential GNR elements are there, but not in the right proportions. If you think about it Axl’s vocals could be in danger of being OTT at any time, but in this one they actually are.
Sprinkle on:
Thank you for visiting and have a germ-free day. Hugs, Mette
Advantages:
even
And the kids' surgery went very well today. They were in and out in no time. Clay was loopy and goofy as they took him back to surgery. He was giggling so hysterically that the nurse asked, "Did anesthesia come and give him a shot?" Um, nope. He's just a goofball. As always, having surgery done in a children's hospital sure makes you thankful for healthy kids. Say a prayer for all those kiddos who are in the hospital for more than a simple ear tube surgery.
Pick black as color or any other if you have a specific design for your game in mind.
Places like Haiti after the earthquake.
If you are a UK/EU based undergraduate due to graduate this year, you can register with the programme. To apply for an internship, all you need to do is send in an up to date copy of your CV, along with a covering letter explaining why you are suitable for the position, how you display the skills required, and why you want to work there.
First let me say that I’m working my way back into film watching rhythm. I haven’t watched a new film in a while, mostly thanks to the NBA Playoffs. But if I wait for that to be over, I’ll really get behind.
If city officials have tattoos on their arms and legs, the written survey requires them to indicate exactly where and how big the tattoos are, in addition to giving their names.
For an executive position, most employers would want to hire those who are already an expert in their own field. This means that the applicants should be adept in the areas concerning their chosen careers. This will show that the applicant has already started a coherent career track and is already knowledgeable in the field.
The original of the above photograph was taken by Dustin Soriano Photography. He’s amazingly brilliant and I highly recommend him. This week has been crazy and I know the next couple months will be even crazier, but hopefully I can find sanity in the midst of it all. My boss has been trying to get us to do meditation for busy people on a regular basis to center ourselves, so hopefully I can stick to it and get more focus and clarity on my life.
6. Stain 03:22
Now take the top of your ornament off, and stick the paper inside the hole at the top. You have to roll the paper really tight to get it in there, but it will loosen up once it gets in. It is fun to use lots of different paper, that coordinates, but you can pretty much use any colors. I usually use about 6 or 8 strips of paper. Use enough to fill up most of the inside of the ornament.
2nd Place: $5,000
Last I add the flecks of white back in with my Opaque White and a fine paintbrush. Again, gold is very shiny so I can get away with lots of glints of light. You can really show how bright the gold is by covering up small specks of the top coin edge with white. I like to add light to the edge closest to the light, a point about a third of the way around, and a spot just inside the far edge of each coin (this shows a faint inner rim catching light). In hindsight, I think I still needed more white on these little coins.
Now in its second year, the four-week program got its start this way: Our team at Piedmont was brainstorming ways to improve our community involvement, which is a requirement to succeed at all levels of The Outstanding Building of the Year (TOBY) awards. We considered volunteer programs at hospitals, foundations and other organizations, but decided to develop a program that would bring students from Chicago International’s charter school campuses here to our offices.
If you have been following me for any length of time, you have probably seen me mention somewhere that I am a gigantic klutz. It is not an uncommon occurance to see me trip, stumble, run into things, or fall. I am pretty much always covered in bruises with no idea as to how they got there because I hardly even notice it anymore when I run into things. Not too long ago I had another tumble and it got me to thinking about some of my more memorable falls. For whatever reason, I thought it would be fun to share some of them with you. I was going to do a Top 5, but then I realized that I have already written about the fall that would probably take my Number 1 spot (I am talking, of course, about my encounter with the lava rocks of Hawaii). Rather than tell that rather long story again, I decided to shorten it to a Top 4 and just link you back to my previous story of shame in case you missed it. On to my Top 4!
My friends and I would buy sago’t gulaman,[8] and use a straw to shoot sago at the guard. The poor guard would feel the sticky sago hit him, look around wondering where it came from, but he never saw us hiding behind the bush.
Rick got the award for Husband of the Year when he took the kids to his parents house and left me alone for 48 hours.
So what exactly is a sex scene? What distinguishes it from other scenes in a story?
so i would chat to him on the internet or telephone and he would make me feel better.
The agents seized laptop computers, DVD discs and a video projector before arresting 45 people, including Gwisai, who runs the Labor Law Center at the University of Zimbabwe. All 45 have been charged with treason — which can carry a sentence of life imprisonment or death — for, in essence, watching viral videos.
Wooo-hooooo! We have a brand new beer coming out this Friday (Feb 4)! The Black Adder IBA (India Black Ale)! This black IPA is fully black in color, with a nutty, roasty malt character and a moderate body, with a full, bright hop bitterness and aroma. De-husked black malt provides color and roastiness without astringent sharpness, and dark Caramel and Special Roast also deepen the color while imparting mild sweetness with lots of toasty complexity and depth. Newport, Palisade, Glacier and Ahtanum hops create multiple layers of crisp, American character with no harsh edges. It is 7.3% ABV and has 85 IBUs. Please come down to the brewery and enjoy $2 pints of any of our beers THIS Friday, February 4th. We also plan to can a limited amount of this IBA for sale only at Buckbean, and it will be available mid to late February. Finally, fill up growlers for half off on Feb 5 for the Super Bowl.
A while back I did some small tweaking to our TV stand and I've finally remembered to share it. The living room has had many small changes along the way, I can't seem to get it the way I want, but we're getting there.
“Therefore, those who are conspiring… Opposition is a natural right, and they are entitled to oppose us, just as we did in the past. This is their right. But there is a difference between opposing and conspiring.”
The Girlfriend (L.) and I have been noticing a little phenomenon around us lately. Lesbians who hate penetration, lesbians who are never, no way, no how, ever, EVER willing to even try it. A pal of ours even refuses to use tampons, because, “She doesn’t like penetration, dude!”
This time tomorrow, though, I'll be in Siem Reap. It will be wonderful to see my friends at Anjali House, both young and old, to feel the heat (KL is hot, but Cambodia will be hotter), smell the fruit and hear the birds, ride in a tuk tuk and well, just be in Cambodia once again.
260 Fifth Avenue
I had a 5 o'clock interview (that went great, but still no word) so when that was finished I came home, threw on a comfortable dress and we headed off.
And finally, here is my latest vlog. This week I give my reaction to the synopsis that was just released for JK Rowling’s new book, The Casual Vacancy, which will be released on September 27, 2012.
In the past year, right-wing politicians and residents of Ulpana – located on the outskirts of the Beit El settlement – have lobbied the government to legalize the homes. Last Friday, Transportation Minister Yisrael Katz visited the outpost.
This movie is just awesome. It’s completely accessible and friendly to viewers of more mainstream films, and yet it doesn’t pull any punches and is always elegant, well-written and classy. That’s not to say that the scares aren’t there – they are. The scares are perhaps some of the best I have seen in any post-2000 horror film, as The Others uses a very subtle, understated style that leaves most of the horror to your imagination. And the subtle build of tension eventually leads to a much better payoff when the big, supernatural scares start rolling toward the end.
One thousand boss...
Mom Seriously (MS): When was your first exposure to porn?
The Spiritual path and journey.
“When I was performing back in ’63, I noticed that young Englishman in the audience, gaping at me night-after-night like a trout. Everything he later did on stage – the voice, the face, the strut – he took it all from me. And my bass player was a baboon who looked like Bill Wyman. The first time I saw ‘The Stones’ I thought they were a tribute act.”
Sleep took over the moment I hit the pillow. An insatiable thirst woke me from a dream. An old dream recurred after a very long time and got overlapped with a new one. The havelies have become an integral part of my dreams and surely have some significance and some relation with my past life.
……Obama sent a letter to Afghan President Hamid Karzai on Thursday apologizing for the burning of copies of the Koran at U.S. military base in Afghanistan, the White House said.
And let's close out the month of January with our final look at the cthulhus of 2011.
Make all the money
How do you know criticism is over? I am paid money to write essays no one reads
My husband wanted to give our older child a treat, slerpee, for walking the whole time without complaining, plus it was humid and hot! The temperature here was close to 90 on Saturday. Nuts. Our little one saw her older sister walking into the store with her daddy and became quite unhappy. Teary eyes on small kids look pitiful. Don’t worry. She’s an actress. She would never make it to Holleywood though.
Has anyone told you that with your new haircut you resemble Dora the Explorer? (In the cutest way, of course!)
I find that our French friends have no axe to grind, they accept us as we are and, it seems, that our very reliable English friends out here are the ones that have only had one marriage partner (usually of many, many years). Now I am not being ‘marriage-ist’ but it seems that those who have had multiple marriages/partners seem to be the ones that are ‘not on the level’, are up for gossip, and putting down and ‘gossiping’ about their ‘friends’. My experience shows that those who have just have had one marriage are the truest friends (there are, though, exceptions to the rule as in most things – and you know who you are!).
Norman Cowie
Should Lee Smith be in the Hall of Fame? That's a tough one. It depends how you feel about closers and their place in the Hall of Fame. I tend to think there are too many closers in the Hall of Fame now -- to me, a closer is a specialty position and I think there are literally dozens of starting pitchers not in the Hall of Fame who were as valuable over the length of their careers as Sutter, Fingers and Smith. But, I also feel bad for Lee Smith -- I think had he retired a few years earlier with the same numbers, he would have been in the Hall of Fame within five years.
Think: May and keywords for the month–quotes, May flowers, books with “May” in the title.
What do we do about Jesus? It’s not about hating other people or denying their rights…it’s what do we do about Jesus.
However I underestimated just how nasty Bonnie Kaye could be. I never would have guessed she’d confront my wife at the Brooklyn book show, or insult my Mother in a letter to all my clients - my Mother for God’s sake! Both women were genuinely hurt. I thought Bonnie Kaye championed all women. I hope Bonnie Kaye understands why I don’t tell her which school my daughter attends.
I think Ann and I had a good conversation about the intersection of commerce and creativity in her particular circumstances. I think others will find it interesting too.
CHALLENGE RULES
Combine rhubarb and 1/4 cup sugar in medium bowl; let stand at least 30 minutes and up to 1 hour. Position rack in center of oven and preheat to 350°F. Place large sheet of parchment on work surface; sprinkle parchment with flour. Roll out dough on parchment to 12-inch round. Transfer dough on parchment to large baking sheet. Starting in center of dough round, arrange rhubarb strips in concentric circles and slightly overlapping atop dough, leaving 1-inch plain border at edge. Gently fold dough border up over outer edge of rhubarb topping, folding and crimping dough to create decorative edge. Sprinkle 2 tablespoons sugar over rhubarb. Dot rhubarb with butter. Brush dough edges with beaten egg. Sprinkle edges with 1 tablespoon sugar. Bake galette until rhubarb is tender and juices are bubbling, about 1 hour. Cool galette at least 30 minutes.
Most impressive though, each shot left behind enough shattered frangible bullet laying in the box to account for nearly half the bullet weight. Yes.... the fragments broke down into powder well enough, there wasn't energy remaining to make it though the cardboard box.
Screenplay by: John August
Of course, in his article the obedient Mr Kelly attempts to distance his treasured causes from the acts of Anders Breivik by saying that the clenched fist salute “has a long history as a symbol of defiance and solidarity, commonly associated with both left-wing politics as well as the struggles of oppressed groups - most of them far removed from the politics expressed by Breivik”
Many of us spend a great deal of time and effort trying to find the best strategies to supercharge our eBook selling projects. We find out everything we can about optimal auction start times, listing strategies, pricing techniques and more. We do market research; bring serious copywriting techniques to bear within our auctions and constantly keep our ears open for some new suggestion, hint or wrinkle that will up our eBook sales.
In an otherwise funny passage on trying to book musical acts for a republican convention, Stevens trips up and unleashes a little malice, letting us know that he thinks Ireland is a country that can’t govern itself – this was said during the celtic tiger era, so he perhaps is talking about some deeper issue of independent rule, away from a mother nation.
We tried to figure out the auto-timer.
i was so excited to read this book considering how much i loved Lisa See's "Snow Flower and the Secret Fan". i really did enjoy this story, but i was so upset with the ending. there really wasn't any ending. i guess that's why there's a second book, "Dreams of Joy" and i'm excited to read it. i always love what i learn from Lisa's books about China and the Chinese customs and traditions. her books always make me want to know more.
Take care and thanks for looking!
As I recall in most every instance of being pursued by the police, and I assure you that the majority of those times were for minor traffic offenses, there is this weird mental ritual I put myself through. It’s a kind of self-delusional surprise at realizing that the public safety employee is concerned with little old me, a sort of “Humdeedum deedum... What in the Sam Hill fiery brimstone tarnation of Islam?! Well bless St. Patsy (the patron of southern euphemisms)!! I better pull aside to facilitate this dedicated gentleman in getting to the emergency he surely must be responding to.” Reality sets in by way of that rather oxymoronic concept known as Fat Chance. I thought that perhaps by pulling into a church parking lot I could appeal to his sense of old-timey religion. Fat's evil twin Slim Chance, being more ironic than moronic, shot that one down right quick.
I have to laugh when people ask me how I got the idea for my novel By the Light of the Silvery Moon. The idea is nearly as old as my son...who will be graduating from high school this year!
Later, when I saw them on the boards, a smidgen of sadness would pass through, but I never took it any further than that. Never gave one second of thought to the fact that they would more than likely become part of a lady's coat. When you're young, you sometimes fail to connect the dots. At any age, we can fail to connect the dots. The news, on any given day, can attest to that. And, well, the late 1950's weren't exactly enlightened times. I'm not so sure these are, either, but I'll try to stay on track.
Papillon (Steve McQueen), Papillon (1973)
When you'll vow as man and wife
Spreading around,
They called me to let me know he was tachy at 160 beats per minute so they were sending him to the ER.
Jan Mayen @ Reykjavik Art Museum (Saturday 18. October)
My sister blessed me today with encouragement and a solution to my worry of the day...and I could see His face.
After class, I slowly walked to his office. I stopped and got a drink of water from the water fountain, went to the bathroom, because I felt like I was going to puke. I stopped at his doorway and I could see him sitting at his desk. He was looking at me, holding my paper. Dear God, he was waiting for me.
I enter a thicket of trees off to the right of the truck. There are three Key deer already waiting. I dump the bag of celery out at their feet and crouch down and pet each of them in turn. They allow me to, having long gotten over their skittishness. One of them raises his head and looks at me. Dark, blank eyes staring back. It almost feels as though he passes something to me. A shudder runs up my spine. He drops his head and continues eating.
We got to meet with a woman who keeps a seed bank. She brought out a lot of the seed varieties in little pots and told us about it.
'To Daniel Allen, one, in silver, £2, 10.
The company has been formed after the merger of Plassey Brewery with Gertie Sweet Brewery and is due to the success of the new Wrexham Lager Company. Ian Dale the previous owner of Plassey is fully committed with the new lager venture so it made sense for Jack Hanby, who was brewing his own beers at the Plassey, to merge the two companies and to market the most popular brands of the two companies under the banner of a new company hence The New Plassey Brewery.
"Fine," or "Okay, I guess," or maybe, if you were lucky, you got a "Good."
*Detoxify the liver – happy liver = happy mood
Don’t you know each cloud contains pennies from heaven (Shubby Dobby)
02 - Know Thyself
Alphas : Wonderfall by Webster's Pages
surrounded by imaginary pyrotechnics.
If I don't get to post again before Christmas, Happy Christmas, everyone. May God be with you and your families during this special time of the year. And take some great pictures of all the fun things you do!
The Folies Bergères opened in Paris on a May 1st, which seems appropriate (1869).
Over the rest of the film, Ford slowly reveals how these traditional values and ways of life have been corrupted and made irrelevant by the advances of modernity. The men working at the coal mines are increasingly subjected to more and more injustice: their wages are reduced as cheap labor becomes readily available, and men who have been toiling in the mine for many years are unceremoniously fired and replaced by younger, poorer men who can be paid less for the same work. Mr. Morgan largely takes these changes in stride at first, convinced that the old standards of fairness and decency will remain intact, but the younger generation is not so trusting, and they struggle to form a union that could help them fight against the mistreatment they receive at the hands of the rich mine owners. Ford increasingly provides little way out. Religion offers some comfort in the form of the pastor Mr. Gruffydd (Walter Pidgeon), but his kindly spirit and goodness are an anomaly in a church mostly ruled over by bitter old men. In one chilling scene, these older church dignitaries call a "meeting" at the end of mass to summon one poor young woman to stand in front of the congregation, where they castigate her for having a child out of wedlock, sneering angrily at her; Ford captures the wizened, shaking hand of one deacon in closeup, pointing an accusing finger at the woman. Scenes like this suggest that the goodness and kindness of the Morgan family is only one possible outcome of old-fashioned tradition, and that tradition can also be close-minded and judgmental, so stuck in its ways that there's no room for deviation.
If you would like to subscribe to the May edition of Craft Project Central and get 10 wonderful tutorials for just $10 then click HERE!
held on
9) I bought Pixie a Thunder shirt. She loved to wear it. When it began to smell, I knew I had to take it off of her and wash it. Whenever I tried to get her thunder shirt off of her, she'd run away. One day, I did it, I got the shirt off of her. Pixie snapped at me! She doesn't snap at anyone! She just loved her shirt!
Life's but a walking shadow, a poor player
Then they start,
The key to this year’s calendar was to push myself to stretch my limits. Yup, that’s a lot of pushing and stretching. Essentially, I wanted to make each month completely different from the last to show off some versatility and also because I don’t like just one style. I like a lot of different styles – some more than others sure, but I’ve never wanted to pigeonhole myself either. Everyone will have their favourite months – even I do.
*What could I have done differently?
But music that inspires people to do something worth wild.
So when God speaks to us or about us – he speaks good words over us. God celebrates our life. God likes to do this! Here’s what God’s blessing sounds like:
Pursued
Beside her was the wreckage of her wings shattered into pieces and shimmering like diamonds.
You will notice that part of the story talks about a very tall building. Tall buildings are often harbingers of catastrophe. Years ago Sears Roebuck moved into what was then the tallest building in the world - and almost immediately got into trouble. The minute you start thinking more about your office than your customers, you're in trouble. I actually share an office - which I only visit once a week, to general relief.
Did you have any top products for 2011? How was it for you? Do you want next year to be like this one or completely different?
I went down into the belly of Victoria Square, down into to the subbasement car park for a quick toke. Down there I could see right up through the crisscross of escalators, right up to the dark-tinted areola of the luminous blue-tit biodome, the capstone of this murky “shopping mecca” - and as a mecca it possesses our unmistakeable drab Ulster piety complementing perfectly Consumerism's universally dark architecture. I was struck by a vision then, a memory from my own future, or possibly that of a future
“Cool sack,” commented the production coordinator. “Hey, I’ll trade you my baloney sandwich if your mom gave you Lunchables today.”
Ask most Manchester United fans the same question and the responses would be almost a polar opposite. And yet, both sets of fans were presented with the same facts.
I visited my local quilting store and found the perfect fabric for the "I Spy Charm Swap" that I am participating in. I was surprised to learn that the store actually had a few fabrics from Sarah Jane's Children at Play collection! This is one of my favorite fabric lines; I was this close to buying the entire collection at one point online. I must say touching those fabrics in person at the store was so surprisingly satisifying!
An industry analyst said the proposal gives power companies a break as the rules would not regulate the existing plants subject to other EPA rules on mercury and other emissions. “We think this is very reassuring news to an industry on the cusp of investing billions to meet,” those other limits, said Christine Tezak, an energy policy analyst at R.W. Baird & Co.
- 36 levels
Both Cara and Jen have been successful fundraisers for Susan G. Komen for the Cure in the past. Cara is currently organizing the third annual Bake for Hope at her company’s office site in Marlboro, MA. Last year’s event raised over $2500. Jen has made breast cancer awareness part of her personal mission. In 2004, Jen’s mother was diagnosed with breast cancer. Since then, Jen, her sisters, mom, and aunts walk the Race for the Cure every year. Jen and her family have raised thousands of dollars for the various Komen for the Cure affiliates.
After I took the mask off, I proceeded to pat the excess all over my skin but it actually felt really gross. As I mentioned before, the serum was sticky, so I was left with this sticky film over my skin afterwards. It was not pleasant and it didn't feel refreshing at all. My skin just felt weighed down and when the serum finally dried/evaporated, my skin felt really tight because of the film formed over my skin.
Today as I was cruising thru Overstock looking for possible rug options for my brother's new apartment, I spotted something strangely familiar.
The Meanings of “Indian Blood”: Perspectives on Race and Identity
As the poopy diapers roll, and the kids go nuts, we have shared a lot of laughs in the last few days, and the kids have enjoyed her company as much as I have.
I hope you are all well and enjoying the prospect of spring and summer coming your way. I would like to say a big THANK YOU to everyone who entered the last challenge Easter....your work was out of this world, so many talented people out in blogland!! I wish I could name you all as winners it would be impossible for me to choose if I didn't have the Random Generator.
Some URLs don't come out as links so here's how to do it. (Don't feel bad; it took me months to figure this out! Finally, Gautami took pity on me and showed me how. Thanks, again, G!)
Leave papers December 3, 1943 for 6 hours….
The May Queen’s for trying,
As we are once more coming up to the anniversary of Summorum Pontificum, it seems a good time to think about how much impact, directly and indirectly, the Pope's more generous permission for the TLM has had in Australia.
Because when I see your face
Of course there was the obligatory pause mid way through writing it to give my mind a break from it. But as I worked on this book. I was surprised by how it affected me as I spent time studying the lives of people who made a difference for God.
THEY HAVE THE RIGHT OF WAY.
I'm a little perplexed so when I get home I pointed out to him that we do have butter and showed it to him. It slowly dawned on me (when he looked at the butter with a blank look on his face) that he did not know that there was such a thing as real butter and he did not know that butter comes in stick form.
In about 2 000 letters to President Kgalema Motlanthe, the children asked him to address the crime problem, because they were scared of going to bed at night.
She’s going to visit her special someone the weekend before that random Tuesday in February. So we discussed Valentine’s day (and gay marriage and abortion and religion!).
In an article today, John Eggerton, of Broadcasting & Cable, reiterated Puerto Rico’s call for an FCC reversal on their decision to delay assisting the island in its Broadband implementation. Given that the lack of access to minimal IT infrastructure severely limits a society’s ability to compete on any economic level, Puerto Rico should be considered a high priority for increasing broadband access.
3. Galaxy S II on the Ultimate 1000 plan from Three. It’s the mot popular Android phone of the year so far and now extremely affordable. Nothing to pay upfront and £29 a month for a huge allowance whcih includes 1000 minutes, unlimited internet data and 5000 texts.
The highlight of the in-law trip for me was a very serious game of Family Feud. (Did you know you can get Christmas Family Feud questions off the Internet? Genius, I tell you!) I had the brilliant suggestion that we play in-laws against the siblings.
Bill Direen / Extract from Hyperbaton, or the Ballad of Rue Belliard (word 9692 to 10939) / 90
I'll never need anybody's help in any way
Since perhaps the dawn of human consciousness and self-awareness, man has explored various means to unite his body and mind so as to produce a superhuman effect and near apotheosis state of being. To this end various forms of meditation and physical ritual, including pain and suffering, the ingesting of mind altering substances, fasting, and a cornucopia of endeavors have been practiced throughout recorded time. These practices have been quasi-exploited in modern times as seminars, lectures, books, DVD’s, retreats, spiritual awakening events and the like. These examples of merchandizing now form the foundation of a vast industry profiting from our simple desire to be more enlightened, self-aware and conscious of our purpose.
Re-reading Wodehouse for suitable quotes, I’m struggling to contain myself to quoting just a paragraph… or two. Wodehouse may be quotable, but it’s infernally difficult to draw a firm line and stop quoting. Today for example, I have been reading ‘All’s Well with Bingo’ from Eggs, Beans and Crumpets, which opens as quoted above. It continues as follows:
These pious and fruitful devotions, however, were looked down upon even by the earliest of reformers in the 20th century liturgical movement. In a pitched frenzy that rivals in intensity the the iconoclasm of the seventh century, those involved in the liturgical movement, even in the early years of the 20th century, became obsessed with a single phrase written by St. Pius X, "full and active participation". A misinterpretation of the saint's words, and a misapplication of a single phrase, used constantly out of context, has caused the unfortunate perception that those who are not astutely following every prayer and gesture at the altar are somehow not participating in the Mass.
ducking behind NO DUMPING signs
For this week's troop meeting, we will be having another Walk-About. Watch for an email from Brandy letting us know where we will be walking-about!
If you have, watch out for HER.
“She had an angelic look about her. Blissful. She was at peace. No more bunching. And she didn’t have spaghetti for lunch.”
Once Charlotte’s hearing was covered by music, the officer leaned a little closer to John. “I got a call about a woman being held in a motel, seemed like an abduction, also some shots fired. The guy in the trunk was heading in that direction, not in the direction of the bus, so maybe the other two guys are holding your friend in the motel.”
Nor your wrath move to appease
And like everything else in my life this accusation revolves around sex. Because I actually refused it, not once, but twice recently.
The original version from the 1970′s managed to scare and disgust me when I first watched it on DVD some years ago. This remake version does not pack the same punch at all. Still it’s gory and the guys get what they deserve in the end but it leaves me with a feeling of why did I watch this?
I was there when you rise, life came alive, and I ran
What do you all think, though? Are P Dawg and S_Lyphe right in asserting that you have to take calculated Ls if you’re dating someone or you won’t progress it further? More importantly, do you think I should still get kudos for changing the flight, even if I presented the change in the wrong way? Let’s discuss…
I am a lifelong fan of Bond movies, and my writing partner, Holmes, is a man with experience in intelligence and covert operations. This week, we’re continuing our look at this iconic movie series with a few comments about From Russia with Love.
But this post is really about tacos.... Or at least about food!
This is cause for concern in the minds of numerous residents whose homes would be occupied and turned into defensive bunkers by the UK military:
Anheuser-Busch (1127 Pestalozzi St. & Lynch St). OK, let’s be frank, most of you aren’t going to be interested in drinking the beer from AB. But, it’s one of the oldest breweries in the country and it’s certainly cool to see some of the historic buildings. The tour itself is very impressive, but don’t expect the tour guides to know much off of their script.
I was determined to get the caramel right this time! I decided that my main problem lies in trying to make sure the caramel is sufficiently caramelized, which led me to leave it on the burner just a few seconds longer. By then, the thermometer would register above the correct number. This time, I decided, I'd be sure to remove the pan from the heat at 360--a full ten degrees lower than the proper temperature of 370. (No, I didn't take it off the heat at 192.4
Right below our school building is a busy street corner, where we have our lunch every day at the local mata’am. While scarfing down a schwarma or a bowl of “ful” (beans), we usually have opportunities to chat with other Sudanese who frequent the cafeteria. We’ve met university professors, public health workers, amjad drivers, businessmen, and other students from Jamaa Africa across the street. We are thankful for any opportunity to practice what we’ve learned in class.
Now I didn't have a lot of things to decorate this tree with and I found that I had some vintage St. Pat's postcards ( have no idea where I got them from ) so I added them to the tree too.
Fresh grated coconut - 1/2 cup
Many thanks to Willie for answering the questions on the MTBCSC. Next week we will be publishing our Q&A from newly formed Aberdeen CSC “Bishop Crosas”. Our First Scottish based CSC!
Egyptian belly dancer Lucy considers 99.9% of Egyptian belly dancers respectable and honorable, stating that their repeated marriages is better than getting involved in illegitimate affairs. She added that despite the fact she married at the age of 16, she and her husband are still together. May I, as a historian of Egypt, add some support to her remark about belly dancers' believing strongly in marriage? The most famous of them all, and according to a now-departed generation the greatest Egyptian belly dancer of the last century, Tahia Carioca (1919-1999), who should probably someday have a blogpost devoted to her, certainly agreed. She had 14 husbands.
I know that we all want an easy solution to 'where to stay'... me included... but experience has taught me that what you put in in terms of time before your trip will ultimately make all the difference...
Only in silent shadows and in dreams?
More than Honorable Mentions went to Charlotte Mandel, Rachel Lim, Sarah Freligh, Jose Ocampo Reyes, Joan Mazza, Scott Wiggerman, Janann Dawkins, and Jennifer Kanke.
When I gave him Worst-Case Scenario: Amazon, his eyes lit up and a smile grew on his face. As I explained the concept -- he chooses as he reads how the story will unfold -- he began thumbing through the book. "Look at this," Wesley said reading the back cover, "Twenty-two was to fail and only one way to survive. Awesome."
Duke earth systems science professor Thomas Crowley has talents that extend beyond his unusual skills at legal analysis. His CV, for instance, includes among honors and awards the following item: “Winner, Division of Earth and Ocean Sciences NCAA Basketball Pool.”
Siouxsie & The Banshees Cities in dust UK
Shire Eplaheimr: -
6. Instrument Storage. This room contains Laleth's collection of mundane musical instruments. The PC's can find a delicate harp, a chime staff, a painted mandoline, a bell chord, a dulcimer and a pair of resonant orcish war drums. All instruments are of masterwork quality. Some of the instruments are unfortunatly defunct, because of broken strings, etc. Two Songhaunts inhabit the room and are stoically trying to maintain the instruments. The Songhaunts attack when the PC's enter the room.
The Bus Test is a way of reminding yourself of the realities of making print ads that aren't like taking your client's money and hiding it in an envelope, then burning it. It's simple. Sit on a bus in the morning, or the evening - sit next to someone who is reading a newspaper or a magazine. Now, just watch them. Watch how they read the magazine, how quickly they turn the page. how they flit from one headline to the next. How that full-colour-full-page ad that someone has spent their last two weeks making just got flicked past in less than a second. Do this a few times, do it every week. It's very helpful to put everything into perspective.
And sometimes, early reviews begin to pop up.
The Winds of Khalakovo is a satisfying entry into the Epic Fantasy fold that may seem familiar in some ways, but Beaulieu takes those familiarities and evolves them with his own unique and complex flair. I give The Winds of Khalakovo 8.5 out of 10 hats. The sequel in The Lays of Anuskaya series is titled The Straits of Galahesh will explore a region little seen in the first volume and should be out in April 2012.
This is not something that Katie will just grow out of. She has an absolute dislike of these types of things. It is complete sensory overload for her. Yes, she will learn to cope with it, but this kind of stuff is ALWAYS going to be a challenge for her. Even though she knows having her ears cleaned and her earrings changed doesn’t hurt. Even though she WANTS it done, it is a huge source of stress for her, yet she doesn’t want to give up her pierced ears. “Normal” kids may have issues like this the first time or two it happens, but eventually they get over it. Ours won’t.
K: Is it easier to write about something more personal to you or something like the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina or Guns N’ Roses?
past them. Alvy reaches out to pick up a glass; Robin reaches over and picks
I wasn’t sure how it would look with the quilt, but I love it!:
Red concludes the Three Colors trilogy with a moving examination of the notions of fate and chance as a beautiful runway model named Valentine (Irene Jacob) crosses paths with Joseph (Jean-Louis Trintignant), a bitter retired judge, when she accidentally hits his dog with her car. She lives in Geneva and maintains a long distance relationship with her irrationally jealous boyfriend over the phone. There is also subplot concerning a young man studying to be a judge and who is also having relationship problems.
The man that wrote SS seemed very sweet in his response, so SS thought it would be nice to send him a little note thanking him for responding and being so kind.
It doesn't matter if you have no experience of being on a design team, as long as you have your own blog where you can show your creations, you can apply :)
Of course, it was Unkgee who had the last laugh when "Stuck in the Middle with You" skyrocketed into the Top 10 shortly after this incident. Rubbing salt into the wound was the name of Unkgee's band: Stealers Wheel.
3) Denis Smith. Mr Stoke City himself. My favourite Stokie of all time.
East coast .. Virginia , West Virginia, Pennsylvania, Indiana, Ohio, New York, New England.. be on notice of the possibility of extreme weather coming your way.
I never was completely sure if the protective circle around the sign-waving crowd was to protect them or contain them.
GHA: Got Heartburn Again
Felicity’s face was still contorted from shock and confusion and grief, and she looked at the composed David with temporary hatred. ‘How can you, God, how can be so calm? Wasn’t he your friend?’
I'm still making final cuts to the list of questions I've scratched into my trusty travel journal over the course of last month's break, or 'January of Jim' as I like to call it, but I can give you a rough idea. Perhaps you've read my little 'life as I see it' picture book.. you know the ice cream tattered one that sits on the soda fountain counter here at Mt. Tom's. In case you haven't seen it, click here - Hand-me-downs: Some Slightly used Tips on Life for my Little Brother. In a nutshell, consider this your chance to share with the world (ok, maybe not the whole world but our little world) a few of your own thoughts on life, liberty, and the pursuit of being happy.
I'm probably alone in this world as I don't really like chocolate. Don't get me wrong I will and do eat chocolate but I never think about it or have to have it and when I get given chocolate I always feel slightly disappointed! However I never tire of flowers and roses, including any flower or rose based products as they are always a joy.
by the living Presence
Today in class, one of our interdisciplinary groups presented on Human Health concerns. One of the group members mentioned that dangerous toxins from everyday products (shampoos, body washes, facial products, etc.) can be found in blood in the umbilical cord- the vital lifeline between a mother and her unborn child.
The lace was bought there as well. They had 'I love you', Just Married', and 'Love' on 4
S: The animals come to our rescue from a variety of situations. They are treated with compassion, given support, either medical or/and emotional, and live in a safe, secure environment, and most important, given the love they deserve, but have been denied. Some of the animals have never known a gentle touch, and it is so rewarding to be able to stroke a once feral cat, or earn the trust of a skittish goat. Animals are extremely affectionate and intelligent, and to see the animals literally 'blossom' under loving and tender care is beyond words.
Demolition is the easy option. Easy for the planners, the developers, the money men, the decision makers. Not so easy for the displaced residents. Demolition doesn't require us to engage with these buildings, to re-imagine them, to use what works well and transform the rest.
For some countries especially in the west, it is considered as a social taboo to spit while in other countries like ours, it is accepted in the least possible way. In earlier periods, spitting is a cultural icon, some parents spit lightly on their children to prevent some sort of evil spirit lurking in the child. In Quezon province it is known as the ‘balis’.
Charlie Rouse (ts) Thelonious Monk (p) John Ore (b) Frankie Dunlop (d) recorded NYC, November 6, 1962
He later went to work as an apprentice in the atelier of Roger Vivier, shoemaker to the Queen and widely regarded as one of the world’s top shoe designers. Later, as a freelance designer, he created shoes for Chanel, YSL and Maude Frizon, before setting up his own company in 1991 in Paris with Princess Caroline of Monaco his first customer.
I've always been able to put things out there and get things in return. If I'm looking for a
We rode home literally in silence. Then near the end of the ride he said he would try to think about it and “tell me what I want to hear.” Once we got home the conversation continued, although at that point it was no longer a “conversation.” It was him yelling at me. When I didn’t yell back or engage he only yelled louder and threw in sarcasm and contempt to bait me (sarcasm is my ultimate pet peeve). He kept saying there was nothing to tell, that he can’t “remember,” and “we talked about sex, that’s all.” I expressed my disbelief that he wouldn’t remember anything at all, especially since he was the one doing it and he admitted he initiated everything. I proposed that maybe it was just too hard for him to admit all of the things he had done because it would expose a part of himself that he didn’t want to admit to.
Other Reviews I Appreciated:
“It will be late when we finish our dinner”
She wanted Lee and Erika to be happy.
We celebrated Kurtis 3rd birthday today. It was low-key and casual. Mostly family in attendance.
invites it, and it will not be gone.
The trumpeting announcement of the ice cream van to our cul-de-sac signalled a rarer treat for me than the other kids. Yes the mangled tones of "Green Sleeves" or some other vaguely recognisable melody sputtered through the air like an old emphysemic tramp wheezing a tuneless whistle. But rather than the pitch, I was interested in the separation of the notes from one another. As if each one had to be hand-cranked from whatever apparatus churned the chimes out through the van's loudspeaker. So unsteadily wavering and imprecise were their amplitudes, that the sound upon the air couldn't in fact be located as emitting from any point at all, least of all the vehicle itself. And the distortion lingered there. Even on breezy days there seemed no dispersing them, rather they billowed like laundry on the washing line. The rapturous screams of the kids slipped into its shrill slipstream and took on its unearthly tintinnabulations. While I looked wistfully on from my bedroom window. Seeing as my mother had forbidden me from ever buying an ice cream from the van. Having heard that every two years or so, some child suffered from a food poisoning laid firmly at its door.
"To win one hundred victories in one hundred battles is not the acme of skill. To subdue the enemy without fighting is the acme of skill. Thus, what is of supreme importance in war is to attack the enemy’s strategy." - Sun Tzu, "The Art of War"
Tormented, torturous trials and tribulations,
But it didn't happen overnight. Nope, it was a process. But now that the process is complete and the pantry is organized, life couldn't be better for this small town gal. For her daily routine has gotten easier and streamlined, and that makes for continued happiness day after day.
It has been a very busy year so far for our Alliance and in case you’ve missed anything, or want to know what we are up to, you may find this update useful. We have seen the appointment of a new Premier of our province, a Federal election called, and some changes and a review of gaming funds underway. We can also look forward to an HST referendum, a Municipal election and possibly a provincial election. We also have a by-election in which our Premier is running for a seat. These all present opportunities and challenges to make sure that our collective voices are heard clearly.
On Friday, each of the survivors of last year's 24th Street corridor assaults received greeting cards with notes and messages of support, along with a $4,000 check from a fund established for their benefit by the Fair Oaks Community Coalition. Cards and checks were delivered by the District Attorney's office of Victim Assistance. One of the women, who has been aided since the attack by close friends in Noe Valley, asked those friends to share this message with the community:
Get ready to improve your mood quickly. Hold a watch with a second hand and time yourself. You will have ten seconds for each of the seven parts of this exercise. Within seventy seconds you should be feeling better. My mood is my responsibility, and your mood is also up to you. I tend to be negative and depressed sometimes. The HappyU exercise helps me to change my mood from sour to sweet!
Because I taught college students, I learned to change the examples. They still followed the same basic structure, but taught my 18 to 25 year old students words that they might actually use in their travels abroad:
Oui, Madame, she said disappearing behind the door with my card only to return in an eternity to say, Madame, ce n’est pas possible. It is not possible.
It is important to note that this shirt cost a whopping $6 at the Gap this weekend. Seriously. I also took the opportunity to wear my new edgy bracelet with a very feminine and professional outfit...and think it adds just the right amout of grr.
Being popular is wonderful so long as your fans genuinely value and love the work that you do. If your audience on the other hand has a different agenda for praising you and you fall into the trap of believing that their accolades mean you are making worthwhile art, then you are playing a fools game.
Fry 2 – 3 doughnuts at a time in VERY HOT OIL until they become golden, chesnutty brown. Place on paper towels to let the excess oil drain. Once they have cooled slightly, either eat plain or dip in granulated sugar.
the heart senses trends
The representational theory of mind is deeply entrenched and some disambiguation is necessary to avoid outlandish interpretations of externalism and its claims. In this book I am examining the meanings of psychological predicates; in this chapter, intentional predicates. So for me the “meaning” in question is the meaning of words like “believes,” “desires,” “hopes,” “fears” and so on, in the sense of ontological reference: what ontological commitments do we make when we use these words? When Putnam says that “meaning isn’t in the head,” he isn’t talking about the meaning of the word “belief” (my topic), he’s talking about meaning in the sense that the alleged proposition that is the alleged object of the attitude is supposed to be about something: the proposition is the thing that is about something, on the representational realist view, and the proposition is represented “in the head.”
Anyway, on to the challenge and this time its Easel cards........with a sketch:
Also, If you feel that you're losing your head too often, then perhaps it’s time to get a new fuckin' hat, eh?
It's an herbivore dinosaur eating a macaroni and cheese tree
The Sweet ‘n Sassy Digi Challenge ladies are bringing you a Fun Blog Hop for our March Digi Release!!
Besides that my plants are finally starting to
The printable party circles in this collection were perfect as cupcake toppers. They come in four adorable designs with the coordinating colors of hot pink, light pink and white. They are also personalized for the guest of honor and include the adorable pink cupcake graphic.
After my time living in South America, I found myself returning to the valley and, through chance and circumstance, relocating much higher up in the valley. At the very top, in fact. Culturally, climactically and geologically, it is a vastly different experience.
The Italian replies, "I no hava no broom. You saida to the
If you want to take a chance to win this digital collage sheet with PRETTY PINK embellishments you just need to leave your name with the choice whether you prefer a PNG or JPEG. This surprise (personal use only !)will close after 1 week. SUCCES !!!
Midwife
Kirk and Spock then fight and Spock is winning because he’s all enraged by the pon farr, and it’s up to McCoy to save the day. This part of the episode is executed beautifully. Using the thin air as an excuse, McCoy gets T’Pau to agree to let him give Kirk a dose of medicine from his handy-dandy medical kit in order to make it a fair fight. Only McCoy doesn’t dose Kirk with oxygen, but gives him a drug to simulate death. So Kirk “dies,” none of the Vulcans decide to check for a pulse, and he gets the Enterprise to beam the two of them out of there.
This is a song made to (allegedly) help you field the questions children have about death. Except the video is terrifyingly blase about the whole thing, and basically asserts that no one knows or cares what will happen when I die, as long as they can prop my corpse up on their porch to scare their friends.
P.S. Ill probably regret this post by tomorrow, but who cares- live in the moment whenever possible!
1 queens
17. We Need a President Who's Fluent In At Least One Language
salt and WHITE pepper to taste
Additionally, Mr. Obama is working on the final details of his soon to be released economic plan to stimulate the economy and create jobs. We are wondering if it will be noticiablly different than last years plan that he announced September 6, 2010. In that one, he proposed a new Infrastructure spending plan to create new jobs consisting of: $50 billion to improve 150,000 miles of highways, 4,000 miles of railways and 150 miles of runways.
Much to the contentment of Pokémaniacs the apple over, Nintendo and Bold Aberration accept assuredly brought a able Pokémon bold to the Nintendo DS with Pokémon Architecture and Pearl, and it delivers abundant of what a fan would desire—a richer, added abundant presentation, the adeptness to action and barter Pokémon over the Internet, and of course, added than 100 aboriginal Pokémon to collect. Like any of the bulk Pokémon amateur arise aback the aboriginal Red and Dejected hit in 1999, Architecture and Fair action some nice upgrades, but if you didn’t like Pokémon then, you apparently won’t affliction for it now. That said, it’s a little hasty how able-bodied the blueprint holds up in Architecture and Pearl, which is a attestation to the able fundamentals of the alternation as able-bodied as the aloft of the execution.
For Mother's Day, Adam surprised me with a lovely gold necklace that has a gold mother & child pendant on it, it is such a beautiful gift, I adore it so much :). We also went to an awesome brunch in the late afternoon at Elizabeth Park's Pond House Cafe in West Hartford. Elizabeth Park has gorgeous flowers blooming all over and is home to a beautiful rose garden. Adam's mom truley enjoyed the brunch and spending time with her grandchildren as well. It was perfect!
What if it had never happened, the divorce? Would Charlie be at school right now, getting ready to graduate? Would he be the captain of a team or the valedictorian or the "most likely to" anything? Would I be busy making plans for a graduation party and gushing to people about how he had narrowed down his college choices to two out of state schools and the University of Minnesota?
And if you think that is bad, then check out the name of the new line…
T H A N K Y O U
It’s just here to let you know
Sounds like a hopeless epidemic? There is help. According to a recent research paper, 12-month quit rate for smokers who did not use assistance (counseling, drugs, etc.) is a only 4-7 percent. However, with assistance of some kind, that success rate more than doubles to 15 percent. While 15 percent still seems low, it represents a doubling of success rates. Speak to a health care professional and get the assistance that will help you to become more successful. Take care of yourselves and each other…
In all my dealings with religious people, I have noticed primarily two categories. (There may be more than two, but these are the only two I personally have witnessed). First, we have the depressed category and secondly we have the arrogant category. Both categories are committing the same exact sin. They both are worshiping their religious performance. They are either beating themselves up for their badness (depression) or else patting themselves on the back for their goodness (arrogance). In both cases, the focus is themselves. They live “in the name of Jesus” and yet live for nothing more than trying to get it right. Striving and striving and endless striving.
Which just in itself is a great feeling!
Here is a taste
I've visited El Loco several times now, and the corn chips have become a mandatory order. They always arrive quickly, the thick corn chips perfect for dipping into the rich guacamole and a salsa that is vibrant with chilli and herbs.
I hope you all have a fantastic weekend....hugs and lots of love...stay safe and warm.
opens her pliant arms to all the wonder in the world.
After we got him we decided to go to 7-11 real quick so Dreamer could pick up some Slim Jims so that he could pay homage to Macho Man (He played his theme music at 6:00 pm while snapping into one and saying "Oh Yeah!"). So as we're pulling in we see this odd sort of character I suppose, a tall dark skinned guy who was wearing a white bennie, long sleeve shirt, white bubble vest, white track pants and drinking a steaming cup of coffee. Also, just to clarify it was about 90 degrees out. He was yelling something, but we couldn't tell what it was since we pretty much ran inside grabed the slim jims (and some taquitos) and ran out. Headed back to the basement and played L.A. Noire until about nine, that's when the hunger started. At that moment, all I wanted was pancakes, not just any pancakes. I wanted to go to Ihop like never before. We have been attempting to go for a long time, but each time something comes up, also the Ihop on the island isn't open 24 hours either like it should. We seem to always forget and would head there at one in the morning and then realizing that they were closed.
Die Burger has followed up with two articles which provide more background on the contributions of Hamilton Naki. I have roughly translated the main points:
In this situation, her truth – all of those memories, all of that love and adoration – is shining through the pain of her being gone, of being nothing more than another body in another coffin, laying there waiting to hear just another goodbye.
to smile
De Struise Brouwers Black Albert
My great thesis on Python, whether it's the films, albums, or television series is that their brand of humor succeeds because it combines some intelligent, cerebral wit with simple, funny-no-matter-how-many-times gags. This is best symbolized by the death depicted of Admiral Horatio Nelson. You don't need to know about the Battle of Trafalgar to laugh at seeing a dummy in early 19th-Century garb tossed out of a high-rise window. However, you can laugh just a little harder knowing among his last words were "Kiss me, Hardy!", to his second-in-command.
Dream a dream
All of the original pledgers are dead, executed by the state of Texas. I am the last. However, my way of protest was inspired by Kevin Cooper.
My camera wasn't really up to the task, but the wall behind Rojas was beautiful... the heads are sculpted stone, but they fade into the wall and the bodies and gowns are mosaic...
Now onto our NEW CHALLENGE and this week it is OUTDOORS!! So, anything that has to do with the great outdoors - playing games, beautiful outdoor scenery, etc. You have until 11:59pm EST on Monday, Oct. 17 to enter. Of course, we would love to see you use a STAMP-N-DOODLE image on your creation, but you are not required to use one to join us. Click the shop link above to see all the FABULOUS new images Lynne has for us in the shop!!
CELEBRATIONS
The latest instalment of the innovative Drunk on the Moon series has just been released. For those of you not in the know Drunk on the Moon is an inspired succession of hardboiled noir/horror short stories featuring Roman Dalton; a retired detective and once a month, barking at the full moon werewolf.
I did not spend much time with Tøggle this month. She is currently floating around in Arathi Highlands, and spent more of this month posing for me then actually adventuring. She has been smacking around some members of the Syndicate, though.
I remember using some of the weapons that the dead Super Mutants would drop after we killed them, but each of their weapons did not have much ammunition, so we ran out of ammunition for their guns; and we had to keep using our hunting rifles.
So, why don’t I?
That's Sunday dinner at Grannie's house!This book gets a rating of 10 out of 10, because it's one a parent could read over and over to a child, with all the things Grannie had to do to keep Jay Jay occupied while they waited: putting out the dishes, feeding the fish, spilling the candy tin (no, that was Jay Jay without Grannie's help), watching for the arrival of the cars full of people. I like this book (can you tell?).
I tried - in vain - to describe to both the nurse and the OB how I felt "different" - like something wasn't right. The nurse told me that it is common to feel this way at this point in the pregnancy - when most of the symptoms are gone and the baby's movements are not yet felt.
I found myself gazing into space-
During the last several years that Dad was on active faculty in the Computer Science department of McMaster University, he taught a course of ‘introduction to programming for physical science majors’ or something like that. The term project that he liked to assign was a team affair, with each team picking a card game, and developing a program that would play the game both in ‘one human user versus the computer’ mode, or a mode in which all players were controlled by the computer. He converted many of his favorite programs into versions that would run on our PC-XT clone home computer, and I loved to play on them. I don’t think that there was ever a Tyzicha program, but I remember Bismarck and Five Hundred, Euchre and Ombre.
boob stickers
Thanks so much for having me!
the hangover helpers I consumed while at college in North Carolina but astronomically better, not to mention worse for you. Unfortunately, no image is available. I huffed down the stuff before I remembered to snap a picture.
-Turn off flame,Pre heat oven to 180 degrees C or 350 degrees F.
It was UPS and it was a package for John and Rachel. John took a break from his power washing and came in. He opened the package and discovered it was from Mike Milligan in Seattle. Each year about this time, they took turns sending something exotic to the other. They had been good friends ever since serving in the Army Reserves together. Each year Mike and his wife invited John and Rachel or John and Rachel invited Mike and Beverly to a weekend together and the invitation was always included with a dessert to share. This time the invitation was to a long ski weekend
Just a little piece of advice my expat friends who’ve just moved into their new home.
Or might even be there now.
4. Add veggies, mix very well, cover bowl with lid, and leave for 30 minutes on kitchen counter. Preheat oven for 400 degree.
09-18 Camden, NJ – Susquehanna Bank Center #%
Accessories: Antique Brad, Basic Black 1 1/4" Striped Grosgrain Ribbon and Basic Black 5/8" Satin Ribbon, Dimensionsals
NOT THIS ONE
See ya in blogland,
Alright folks, the April Carnival of Pen, Pencil and Paper has arrived! If you haven't seen some of these blogs before, you may want to add them to your favorites and check out their archives.
Third bus to depart (second to arrive) gets in and both Team Fed and the Dixie Chicks solve the problem in short order.
I don't know how I'm going to get through all these questions, so I'll keep my responses really short! I'll be back hopefully tonight to answer the them, but I'll probably have to spread it out over a couple days because that would be one long post!
So its a break in the semester. You’re home with your parents & family, taking time out from the usual routine of lectures and seminars, and alongside it, the city lifestyle. At first, its great. Most of us are probably greeted with the welcome wagon, and are genuinely excited to see our loved ones once again. For the time that we are home, we probably don’t have to do much (if any) cooking, or even food shopping for that matter, meaning more money to spend on clothes and things we love. Nor is it likely that we will have to do laundry, or any heavy housework. However, whether you’re enjoying the lie-ins, having days out with the fam, or utilising this time to get lots of productive things done (like me, for example), it is highly inevitable that at some point, most of us will begin to feel at a loose end. We will, effectively be somewhat ‘stuck in a rut’.
Which is kinda what this post is about; my crazy, loud,extremely energetic boys!
The wedding is fast approaching. Dish by dish, book by book, towel by towel, they are building their first home together. It is such a joy to watch; to sit back and see how they interact with each other. And it's fun to see the unflusterable Elie, so very flustered; the calm and patient and quite in control Lauren, be just a bit unnerved. It's wrong of me to enjoy it, and yet I do - because even in these moments, I can see the caring, the understanding, the gentle and patient way they deal with each other.
Donahue remains the longest continuous run of any syndicated talk show in U.S. television history.
The original recipe for this calls for a big old ring tin, but I bought a cute (yes I'd use the term 'cute') 15cm round cake tin and wanted to try it with this instead! It's great for just a few slices if you're only baking for at home.
I left Cracker Barrel overly-full but with plenty of room to spare under my new cloak.
Golden City Brewery Golden City Imperial Stout
The power of slow acting involves breathing deeply and turning the gaze inward. All our answers are there. The challenge is quieting the mind, and the world around you, long enough to hear them.
I can't wait for spring to really begin, so I don't crave comfort food in a bowl.
Three Beautiful Things This Week was inspired by a wonderful blog that Clare writes called Three Beautiful Things. Everyday, Clare writes about 3 Beautiful Things that happen each day in her life. It's a wonderful blog! I can only hope to imitate her in a very small way.
Intensive Initiations
Whilst watching 'Pandaemonium' the other evening I learnt something that I really should have known and that is the fact that 'The Three Bears' is not a Grimm's fairy tale, although it is always packaged as one, it was first published anonymously by Richard Southey in 1837.
Regarding my Tough Decisions post of last week... Today I turned in my Quasi-Two Week notice at Spinning Bean .... I say Quasi because I will still be working there on Mondays for the time being. But I will now be full time at Obsessions! I am so excited to be there on a more regular basis where I can get to really know the customers and the store even better! I have met some great ladies there and look forward to spending more time there learning and teaching!
Hey y'all, one of the sponsors at BlogHer, the one teamed with Emily Post's descendants who now write children's books about manners, was Merci chocolates, and last year they started a new holiday - National Thank You Day - which is on September 22nd. To kick off the new holiday they had a contest and they're having it again this year. You can nominate someone you feel deserves a big "thank you" and if your nominee wins, s/he will receive a $20,000 prize suggested by you (meaning you get to choose what the money is spent on for that person), delivered in person on National Thank you day by Peggy Post. The contest is almost over, though, so if this is something you want to do get over there right away. The contest closes at 3pm CT tomorrow.
The planned part of the day began after this. We biked to the bus stop. This might not sound that exciting, but it’s awesome for two reasons:
I don’t get to see many sunrises or sunsets any more. I work from 3-10pm, so for 5 days a week I am asleep for sunrises, and at work for sunsets! But I have always viewed sunrises and sunsets with awe and fascination. They are such a simple, everyday occurrence – they can even be pretty boring sometimes!
Attempts to resuscitate were unsuccessful.
We got acquainted with many of the people in the first couple of rows. These are the die-hard fans, the ones who follow the band and pay extra money to get in early. Great group.
Another thing I love about summer is wearing my casual denim shorts. They say relax and don't take your day too seriously when I wear them. Which gets me thinking about the "new" summer trend that was spotted on many fashion runways for spring/summer 2010. The good news is I have NOT seen much of this "new"trend. Which trend, you ask? WEARING DOUBLE DENIM!!!
i remember how the first few days of wearing tudung, i didn't know how to belit the selendangs so that it doesn't move. i remember the struggle and the long process of trying to belit my shawls nicely. it was a challenge even, to make my friends treat me indifferently from before. of course, i understand some of them feel they can't talk about certain subjects with me anymore because of my 'new appearance'.
behind and beneath.
I learned this many years ago when I first started to get to know a once close female friend. She listened to my story, my continuous social awkwardness and explained to me what I should do instead to help solve the problems. Thanks to those long discussions, often late in the evening or during the night, I learned to relax then to trust myself and finally to act with moderation even if I had a strong desire to be close to someone. It worked rather well after a while. I made friends and felt that I could behave like a normal human being. I didn’t feel too nervous or shy or anxious. I started to have some confidence and enjoyed myself more by not always worrying, thinking or assuming the worst.
On the evening of New Year's Eve I set up a little 2'9" course for Klein. We hadn't jumped for about a month mostly due to the rain and a couple small snow storms trashing the footing in the arenas. It just turns to clay around here. Then it took forever to dry out. Nice weather has returned, arenas were looking good and we were excited. I set up a two stride, a wide oxer, a vertical, and another jump that was a horizontal X. That way she could stretch out and it was only 2'9" because it was meant to be a little confidence builder. AND since she hadn't really jumped for a month. We'd jump a xc jump here or there on the barn property but nothing serious.
Happy hopping!!
MY TRIP WILL BE BY MID WEEK AND I EXPECT YOU TO COMPLY BEFORE THEN SO THAT THE DELIVERY CAN BE COMPLETED. IF YOU DO NOT COMPLY, THEN IT WILL NOT BE MY FAULT IF YOU DO NOT RECEIVE YOUR CONSIGNMENT PACKAGE.
"We also rejoice in our afflictions, because
Top 25 iTtunes playlist. I am rebuilding iTunes right now due to a computer crash. Here is my top so far.
Huh, uh huh huh huh huh
And… (drum roll!) Cincy Chic recently did an article featuring several local blogs in which I had the pleasure of being one of them. Check out the article!
Another fabulous giveaway from a great blogger! Leah from Struggle Sews a Straight Seam is offering up THREE things in her giveaway! Number one is an uncut Vintage Vogue 8728 (sizes 8-14) of which there are some lovely versions out there like this one by Mena or this one by Casey or this one by Erika! She is also offering up three yards of the coral pink silk fabric pictured above. But if the 1940′s isn’t your style, not to worry, because she's also giving away Butterick 6258 (B34).
Hey hey! Back again for another weekend recap!
Kimmie
ah, yess, the photos... loved that editorial. and that's it from me :)
Once everything is done, the very last step involves charcoal. I like to outline my collage elements and some of my doodles with charcoal to give them depth and to pull the whole thing together. Since charcoal smudges and is impossible to write on top of, its always my last step.
Then, as I worked last week, I decided my big clean up project could be my DIY project for the month!
during small windows of time.
F - 10 tempo
Do no longer believe the lies of the food industry and the ‘main stream’ media. Contrary to what so-called ‘health experts’ claim, aspartame is NOT safe!
I think that this will live on as one of my favorite books in this extensive series. It brought back all of my childhood memories of playing the very first Oregon Trail game! Do you remember fording the Blue River, oxen dying, eating poisonous plants, breaking an axle? I do! All that and much more takes place in the diary of Hattie Campbell.
Unfortunaltely, this area is where I've begun to stack two layers of furniture -- geeze, I hope I don't do that all the way around the studio! Yikes. This is my bin storage on rollers. I have rubber stamps and ephemera in these 21 bins. The popcorn cartons hold my decorative and handmade paper. to the left of the bins is an Iris cart with my most used rubber stamps and my heat guns.
So, after seeing it on a bloggy friends blog who is simply too nice to have it ever happen to her I thought I'd do something about it. I figure the direct approach would embarrass my bloggy friend so I've come up with a pledge.
Heimat was broadcast on German television, but was mercilessly butchered, to the understandable horror and anger of the director. Heimat 1 was shown twice on US television: once on cable in 1985, and again in the Fall of 1987 by PBS. The film received a very limited theatrical release here prior to being televised, but received unfavorable reviews by J. Hoberman of The Village Voice, and by Timothy Garton Ash of The New York Review of Books, who charged Reitz with sidestepping the issues of guilt and responsibility for the Holocaust. Fortunately, Reitz did not give up the distribution rights, and viewers may enjoy the work as it was intended to be seen on DVD. A word of caution however– the R1 transfer by Facets video has been horribly botched up: the image is soft; colors are faded; and the non-removable subtitles are surrounded by black rectangles, making the American release one to avoid. Thankfully, Tartan has done an exceptional job on the PAL R2 UK release, and the first two titles in the series are now available at a 48% discount, a significant savings.
In his book, D’Souza says “Atheistic educators are now raising the question of whether parents should have control of what their children learn.” And you and I know that in public schools parents are losing more and more control each and every year.
This Winter has been a strange one.
Cc: Paul Orders
And here is my tag. All images are colored using Prismacolor Pencils and that beautiful Vintage Seam Binding and Jute Twine are from Ribbon Carousel.
I found at Lakeshore that I needed to create separate, individual rhythm and vocal charts. I also began reducing the page to only 90%.
More art walk photographs: Me and the greatest art teacher on the planet, my high school art teacher.
Even more brand new recipes are in development and undergoing trial brews, including a super IPA and Wensley'd Ale.
During the ritual I was able to be witnessed and supported in my grieving, my tears emerged from my bedroom where they had been welling for so long, and it was terrifying for me. I almost ran away, but something, some tiny kernel of courage and wisdom deep inside, wouldn't let me. I'm so glad I stayed. I felt the love and support of a group of people who I had only met two days before, and, crucially for me, felt strong and able to support them too.... through their grief. I felt openess and love filling us all and above all, connection ...to myself, to the people around me, to life itself. The tears were cleansing and releasing, a universal experience. It was a beautiful and life changing weekend.
French Intelligence came to the Poles in 1932 and offered to share their info – during the previous four years they’d gotten copies of the Enigma machine’s instruction manual, operating procedures, and lists of key settings, but they still weren’t able to decrypt signals.
"A military operation has always been the last resort, the least desirable option,” Steinberg added. “So that if now the assessment is that Iran is not up close to the finish line and will take some time to recover and the world’s got another four or five years to stop Iran; then I think that the military option is still going to be on the table, but it's going to be way in the back."
This site includes general information about ADHD, such as a glossary and collection of articles, links, and other resources about the condition. There are also message boards, blogs, and places for individuals and families to share their stories. It also includes information about treatments, including medications and side effects, diet, behavior modification.
One can anticipate, however, the development of a new basis for this kind of assistance. This new step will imply that the specifically human handicap in childbirth is understood. In other words, it implies that the concept of neocortical inhibition is not ignored any more.
gesture to show you how much you mean!
Earlier opposition tended to come from Jerusalem scribes (3:22, 7:1), but here the Pharisees seem local Galileans, who meet Jesus on His arrival begin to “question/argue/dispute” (Greek root suzeteo) with Him. Their aim is not to learn however, but but to put Him on the spot, in hopes of discrediting Jesus in the people’s eyes, to whom He is as popular as He is unpopular with the Pharisees and Herodians. (France)
This can be almost known as the local version of a fruit and vege salad; but with a more exotic and adventurous flavor to it, as instead of the usual salad mayo-based dressing, the rojak consists of properly chopped fruits (usually pineapples, mango, cucumber, jicama, or other crunchy vegetables/fruits).
Marriage, Murray believes, is the next most important event to conversion, and Jean Ann Walters, whom he married in 1955, has been and remains the first influence in his life. They have five children and ten grandchildren.
½ cup (4 oz. / 125 ml) Double/Heavy Cream (36% - 46% butterfat content)½ - 1 cup Crushed or Ground Roasted almonds for coating
For Wikipedia:
When we are little we are so full of confidence, unstoppable, inquisitive, full of love, and life and character. And then, through the course of “no’s” and heartbreak, and reality, this gets tempered a bit and we become grown-ups.
I also used one of the stencil cut-outs on the bottom of the left-hand page which I sprayed with a copic marker in black.
Jennifer I am naturally drawn to two palettes, one bright (orange and white) and one subdued (blue and brown). I had a lot of fun making my orange string quilt - it was an all-out Orange Extravaganza -- and I'm working on a very mellow, mod Swoon quilt with many of my favourite blues and browns... but overall I haven't made all that much in either one of these palettes.
and this death could be an actual death and it could be the actual death of a dream and since our dreams are literally the stuff our future selves are created from - the death of a dream is huge
Ben learns to let go and to hang on, all at the same time, because it’s the sweet and lovable Ollie who shows him that it’s okay to be cautious, but it’s even better to take a chance on the something that promises to be kind of wonderful if Ben can only allow himself to fall and trust that Ollie is the one he wants to fall into.
SEAN: It depends on the book and the part of the book. I usually have a general outline of the story. I try not to make it too detailed, unless it is required. In some parts of a book I make it more detailed if there is need of a specific timeline. For instance, I wrote a book where there were multiple viewpoints of characters interacting at specific times. It required a more detailed outline to get it consistent.
Retired IT consultant (disabled), musician and animal lover. I support the constitutional concept of Right of Privacy and no discrimination against any person based on race, religion, ideology, gender, sexual preference or disability. I am very concerned about the erosion of our constitutional rights and protections under GWB (and even this administration). I strongly oppose torture, rendition or illegal search and/or seizure (without a warrant) and warrantless wiretapping.
Remarkable photography has been produced by photographers with very little time to spend on their photography, on weekends, evenings, during holidays or while engaged in other work. Being busy with lots of things is no barrier.
Before there was James Blake, Active Child or even Bon Hiver, Toronto’s Mike Milosh, known simply as Milosh was creating swoony, dream-like electronic soul that pulled heartstrings. For this thunderous rainy weather we have here in SoCal, my SONG OF THE DAY is one of my many favorite tracks from his 2008 stellar release, ‘iii.’ “Gentle Samui,” much like the weather outside is a quiet, soothing track until it builds and builds and then pours all over you! Enjoy and put on repeat.
Let no man say when he is tempted, I am tempted of God: for God cannot be tempted with evil, neither tempteth he any man: – James 1:13 KJV
With regard to the system freeze, the Examiner's statement that "a system is hardware" glosses over the fact that a computer system includes software and hardware, and the term "system freeze" doesn't itself say whether the error is an error in a hardware component or in a software component. However, the reference itself clearly taught that the system freeze was an error in memory allocation, which is a software error and not a hardware error. Unfortunately, the Applicant didn't address the system freeze teaching, since the Examiner didn't bring it up until the Answer, and the Applicant didn't file a Reply Brief. As a result, the Applicant may well have lost on this system freeze teaching even if the Applicant did a better job of arguing about the memory usage threshold teaching.
I was not disappointed by the movie. I was glad I had read it in advance, partly because I knew what Katniss was thinking from the book, and her thoughts were not narrated in the movie, but also because I knew when to avert my eyes, because I knew when the deaths and injuries would occur. My daughters laughed at me, watching the scenes wide-eyed. Watching sideways, I could see not too much was shown. (“No gratuitous violence”, one review had promised.)
The Board found the involved goods not to be similar or related in any way, and the channels of trade to be distinct. However, it recognized that there may be some overlap in classes of consumers: namely, students and parents of students.
#1 To keep my weight between 135-145 lbs. Basically did that, was on the higher side of 143-146 but stayed around 143-145 the whole month. I wanted to get back down to 140 lbs but that didn't happen.
If modern Texas politics has ever had a rock star, it was Lyndon Baines Johnson. Starting out as a Congressional secretary and working his way up through the U.S. House and Senate, and eventually to the White House, El Presidente burned his brand onto everything he touched, and the Hill Country in general and Austin in specific would be very, very different today if not for his patronage. Not surprisingly, the Driskill played an important role in his life.
ALL RIGHTS RESERVED: Cesar Zambrano
So imagine my surprise today, while I was fixing a snack in the kitchen, when Junebug yells from the dining room, "Mama! Do you have two egg cells left?"
Here's my line-up of inspiring outfits from the Crew:
So let's see if we can use this post to help open an important door for our readers and for anyone else with whom you would like to share this information. (We have to begin by sending you to another web page to copy the "script" for this tool, because if we simply pasted the script here you would see the tool rather than the script).
“He that believeth on the Son hath everlasting life: and he believeth not the Son shall not see life; but the wrath of God abideth on him.” John 3:36
Will it be for some kind of Nobel prize winning endeavour? Novel writing? Poetry? Blogging even? It would have to be arts based because I’m completely crap at science (if you’re waiting for me to invent a time machine you’d need a time machine just to cope with the wait).
~A
Opening a hotel in New York City is a treacherous business--there are always delays. Which is what Starwood is finding as it tries to get the city's first two Aloft Hotels up and running.
“Hyung that day you want me to accompany you, I had forgotten that it was my anniversary with Su…”
So at an auction at my older kid's school, I bought a couple of trivia games, some card sets, one called Beer Smarts and one called Wine Smarts. So let's see if anyone is actually reading this blog.
He steps around cats, pats the sleepy dogs.
we're not just kids, to say the least
Starting off the day with some humorous talk from a guy who isn’t capable of using TurboTax correctly, and whose boss has racked up 4 trillion in debt in two years
Phreak: But, why? Why did your suggestions make me fight Lulu, and wear Teemo’s bunny suit!
Rule 14 (g): Full membership or associate membership may be suspended or terminated, or a fine may be issued, in any of the following circumstances:-
I was under the gun to get this card delivered to the class mom who is taking care of the gift and party, so no pictures of the inside. I adhered white card stock on both the upper and lower panels of the inside so there would be plenty of room for 22-3rd grade (i.e. not so small) signatures:)) and added the greeting "Happy Holidays from all of us" which says it all!
Still, completed shopping centres in regional towns (21 kilometres fromGlasgow) for €43 per square foot. Might give some in Ireland pause for thought.
If you don't, take heart, because the God of all grace will make you so.
I happen to like pastiche every so often. Maybe there's some part of me that craves the familiarity of the known quantity. There's something oddly comforting about Singularity in that way; you know it's retreading the trodden path, but it's nice to find yourself in familiar surroundings.
And not to step on Officer Shea's accomplishment, but the credit for Sutton's capture really goes to a young clothing salesman named Arnold Schuster, who spotted Sutton on the subway that day, followed him, and managed to flag down police to make the arrest.
In 1980, they went to Fairview Music in Hull to record two songs for a single. Since Future Earth had a limited budget, the band had to record and mix the songs in a single day! Being well prepared, they banged it out quickly. The only trouble they had was getting the right guitar tone, which they attest came out thinner than they had hoped due to the engineer wanting them to play at a low volume.
There death-charged missiles blazed a trail of woe,
Finally, the best glitter in my book, Stickles. It doesn't get away from you, you don't really need to be fast to keep it from spilling and it comes in many yummy colors. I used my Cuttlebug on this card also. This time it was a holiday folder from Cricut. I thought it would be fun to carry the Christmas trees over from the embossing folder, to cutting them out (the basic Christmas shapes that came with SCAL had the perfect tree once I stretched it) and even placing them on the tag.
Even a five-minute break will help. Get away from your desk. Go for a walk - outside is better, but up two flights of stairs and back down is good too. Getting more exercise in general will help you reduce your overall stress levels and that will make it easier to reduce your stress level at work.
Sandro SS/11 Style Platforms with Annmarie O'Connor
This is the drawing received today from Westwood International School in Botswana.
It seems that now days...the boys don't have to pursue the girls because the girls don'tgive them a chance....they do it first! Now let me start from the "Get Go"! Way......Way......back in the day...I was never allowed to call a boy....or show up at his house even by appointment....let alone randomly. Today the girls are apparently really comfortable with themselves...in fact so comfortable that they automatically walkin and go to his room....which is a "No No" in my house. Here lies the trouble. Sometimes these girls may like him but he thinks differently of them....or so he says. He is usually very honest about what he feels or doesn't feel!
Now in a sense that’s quite possible – but only if everyone else is king too. If each person ‘affirms’ not only themselves but others, if each person can, like a king or a millionaire, feel that all of society caters to them, that all of its members respect and value them, that each social decision is based on their worth – if, in short, the free development of each becomes the condition for the key development of all: well, that’s communism.
Rosie: You're handsomer than the other dads. Lots of them don't have hair. So that's good.
"We've worked hard to create an outstanding visitor attraction with the Doctor Who Experience.
Just last month the AA said increases this year had added £21.72 to a two-car family’s monthly petrol bill. A typical 50-litre family car was costing £71.24 to fill, a rise of £5.12 since January.
I didn't realize how much I would miss her
So get inspired by the national colors of red, white and blue. You can get hair accessories in patriotic hues at the No Slippy Hair Clippy® store.
3. Bound to happen. Taking calcium and vitamin D has brought me vomitting and nausea. I figured if I took an ondansatron wait for a 1/2 hr, take the calcium and then take the balance of my pills, this would work.
2. A ‘leveraged’ EFSF will then be used to back up the ‘Big Deal’ between the lenders and the eurozone. There is roughly $500bn in it at the moment: another, say, $350bn would be raised via a series of stealth taxes across the EU as a whole.
Life’s not a bitch! Life is a beautiful woman
Seconds later, the gurgling had stopped.
Yes. I’m posting photos of our place again. I hope you’re not sick of seeing our apartment pictures… I want to document our place before we’ll move out of this current place in less than two months. Please bear with me…
Nose - 1/2 inch circle on edge of paper
“That’s what I said, didn’t I?”
I am NOT accepting e-books, self-published books, indie press books, or interactive media books at this time. Exceptions include those already on my TBR.
Poetry Book Society Recommendation
Then you land and experience the joy of rescuing your luggage from the carousel, and making your way to your final destination.
All you have to do to cash in is believe in Jesus! Know and understand that He was born of a virgin (the reason we celebrate Christmas), lived a sinless life, and died on a cross at Calvary, was buried and resurrected on the third day (the reason we celebrate Easter) and ascended into Heaven! He now sits at the right hand of God, interceding for us! It is a fact!! This story is told in the inspired Word of God, The Holy Bible. Read it!!
There are 100,000 Florida prison, and half of them have abuse problems related to their imprisonment. Last year, says the Miami Herald, only 6,120 got drug or alcohol abuse treatment. Others languish, get out, re-offend to support their drug habit, and are locked up again. Legislators are focusing on this cycle of drug-related despair in hopes of reducing the recidivism rate and lowering the cost of running prisons.
The sender of the message must understand his or her audience in some significant fashion so he can choose an encoding mechanism that will get the message across with as much fidelity as possible (at this point we’re talking about the message, NOT the transmission of the message). A commonly understood language is the best start. However, even with a common tongue, the sender needs to make sure that word choice is appropriate and understood by both parties to mean the same thing.
Some weeks ago I was visiting the greengrocer's in Hornington when I met the gentleman who's opened the new fish shop on the other side of the road: he's a West Indian from a Methodist background. He asked whether I would bless the shop and so yesterday, having gained the permission of His Grace the Rector of Hornington, I did so. The owner was there, a friend of his, and, as I discovered when I looked round, three members of my congregation who turned up after the Walk of Witness, and a bemused customer.
Calamari with sweet chilli mango sauce and timbale of avocado and crayfish
"Valencia and 14th, yeah, that's it," he said with a slurred speech and then "Merry christmas and happy new year and you're beautiful!"
Recently, a friend and fellow atheist parent, Mark Andriesse, was diagnosed with Leukemia. As a core member of Florida Atheist and Secular Humanist (FLASH) Parents, Mark and his wife Angela, along with their two girls, have been a driving force behind the group's success. This is Angela's statement regarding Mark and his health:
The Audi R8 is really a vehicle that needs no introduction. Along with being the poster car of Truth in Engineering, it is recognized by enthusiasts of all ages, and is a benchmark for mid-engined performance cars. The curb appeal only increases with the folding of the roof, allowing for a refreshing, high octane drive that can allows for better clarity of the amazing engine sounds, and more enjoyment of the weather. Just as important, the open top R8 Spyder is a favorite with both the public and experts alike. The high-performance sports car from Audi, the R8 Spyder is a high-tech, high-output and highly desired work of art with the formidable power of its engine, the quattro permanent all-wheel drive and its lightweight Audi Space Frame (ASF) body made of aluminum sculpted into a captivating shape that’s easy to spot from the rest of the pack. With the standard hydraulic motor, the soft top opens and closes within 19 seconds, even while driving at speeds up to 50 kph. Best of all, the R8 Spyder backs up every ounce of its presence with fantastic power. Even the base R8 Spyder 4.2 FSI V8 quattro features a powerful 430 hp. But the herculean 5.2 FSI V10 quattro features a more incredible 525 hp, making it one of the quickest vehicles on the road. Those interested in the V8 model will find it to start at $148,000, while the more powerful V10 variant begins at $242,000.
For me, most of these boil down to societal expectations ("the shoulds"). Sure, some of them can be couched in terms of the child's health and welfare or future happiness, but I found when I examined them closely, and actually tried the unschooling way, that there wasn't any evidence that the societal way led to any better outcome than the unschooling way.
Thanks for playing!
I could not think of a Random Act of Kindness off the top of my head so I am going to think about it and get back to you. Also make sure to scroll down to my previous post to get a FREEBIE!!
Me: Hey Imogen, what are you up to in Grandad's office?
No one condones kidnapping and child-trafficking (at least no one with a moral compass). Obviously, little Anyelí is caught between two families who each appear to love her and call her their own, though she can only be with one of them—and not the other. Her case has hamstrung the will of many adoption proponents who are now forced to ask whether it is worth it if even one case comes to separate a child from her parents. No doubt, any parent would answer in the negative if it were her child who was kidnapped.
Now onto the challenge for this month, going back to our Sweet Pea Stamps only rule, let's give thanks - whether it is a Thanksgiving card, I am thankful for...or a thank you, create a thankful project using fall colors!
1. Define Life Vocation
A Moveable Feast: The Restored Edition by Ernest Hemingway
Where is the report located?
Does this look right, Samuele?
Phase II – December 2011 (16 days) – Customer development focus
I could tell how the last 3-4 miles were going by what I wasn't thinking. Usually I'm thinking "Get this guy!" or "Keep your legs moving! Work your hands!" but instead, the last few miles were spent mainly in numb contemplation of what went wrong. Was it the perfect storm of several extended work, family and personal commitments over the previous week? Or maybe that crash and burn 12-mile run nine days ago, even though I seemed to fully recover from it two days later. Did I blitz last Tuesday's tempo run too fast, and leave some of my race on the track? Have I not recovered from that sore throat I had last week?
4. (Update, because I forgot-ed). I FINALLY got to see the Northern Lights!!! EEEEK! It was our last week in Finland, and the amazingly awesome Megan over at A Suitcase and Stilettos messaged me to say that a big storm was coming through and the Northern Lights were supposed to be great that night. She's in Norway and keeps an eye on these things. So the hubs and I drove out of the city to 'find' them. He about swerved off the highway as they Aurora came into focus and I screamed at the top of my lungs, "THERE THEY ARE!". It was pretty cool. Because of the full moon that night, they weren't as bright as they could have been. But still, they were visible and like nothing I had seen before. And, of course, I don't have a picture. Lost my camera somewhere between Helsinki and Houston in January. Not that the pics would have come out anyways. But for those of you that breeze through the blog (let's be honest, we all do that to some extent), I'll let you think the picture below was them :)
If you don't normally buy short story anthologies because you think they're long, boring and turgid then this is the book you've been waiting for. You won't find anything quite like it in bookshops or on the Internet and, like I said at the beginning of this post, I so wish I'd come up with the idea. Congrats Nik and Caroline, it's a little belter!
What impacted me first when I started was learning about core values and passions, the bedrock of the human soul.
the Detained and Disappeared of Honduras (2/28/10) reported 310 human
You know, I'm only beginning to get a handle on the promotional leg of my publishing journey. But with friends like this, I think it'll be a cinch. Thank you, Aniket. Your signed copy is on its way to India. Along with my gratitude.
I doubt there is a gay person out there who can not relate to Mark Tewksbury’s autobiography, “Inside out: Straight Talk from a Gay Jock” [Wiley, 1 edition, 2007]. That is, until he was propelled into international prominence with his 1992, Olympic gold medal performance in Barcelona, Spain; one of only seven gold medals awarded to a Canadian that year.
The 1916 ordnance predated FAR, its key tool was the building setback, resulting in the famous ‘wedding cake’ skyline of buildings such as the Chrysler Building (1930) and the Empire State building (1931).
Chong, J. Growing Up and Cycling Through the Years to Farmers’ Markets. In Third Wave Cycling Blog. Dec. 3, 2010. Covers also farmers’ markets in Kitchener-Waterloo, Hawaii, France, Germany and Saltspring Island, BC.
Looking at the photos above, I definitely will not be complaining about year 2011. Hopefully there will be more exciting GOOD news, stories to create another chapter in life in this year 2012. Somehow time is just flying by so quickly. So I say let's just live life and cherish every single minute of it when you get to spend time with your love ones. Nothing is more important than that.
For the next six weeks, Babygirl is off school. I will be sending them an email to let them know we need a tutor starting next week. Babygirl can't attend church, go to the mall, eat at a restaurant or hang out with friends. We will be seeing the transplant team Mondays and Fridays, and we can't take the train. The Philly transplant team is negotiating with the local team to see if they will take on one of these visits each week. If not, we will clock over 700 miles per week in travel. If they do, it will drop to 500. God bless Rhonda the Honda, our 1995 Odyssey. Reliability has nothing to do with age!
In compelling the bishop by legal proceedings to grant institution, the form known as Duplex Querula was adopted, which consisted of a complaint tendered to the archbishop against his Ordinary for some alleged denial of justice. The Dean of Arches (Sir H. J. Fust) issued a monition to the bishop to institute Mr. Gorham within fifteen days, or show cause for refusing; institution to be proceeded with by default. The bishop responded by what is called an "Act on Petition," in which he included the book published by Mr. Gorham containing a detailed account of his examination. The bishop expressed himself convinced that Mr. Gorham was of unsound doctrine in respect to the efficacy of the Sacrament of Baptism, inasmuch as he held that spiritual regeneration is not given or conferred in that Holy Sacrament. This elicited a defensive rejoinder from Mr Gorham. The case came on for hearing in the Arches Court in February 1849, and judgment was given in the following August in favour of the bishop. Sir H. J. Fust concluded his judgment by stating that "the doctrine of the Church of England undoubtedly is that children baptized are regenerated at baptism, and are undoubtedly saved if they die without committing actual sin. Mr. Gorham has maintained, and does maintain, opinions opposed to that Church of which he professes himself a member and a minister."
just the way it should be
On Friday, according to a court document filed by US prosecutors, Madoff waived a formal grand jury indictment—a legal procedure that means the defendant is negotiating a plea bargain.
158. Mulligatawny Soup from Kimberton Whole Foods (Kimberton, PA) and Rafer & Beth’s Hot Curry Pickles with a Soft Vienna Roll from Wegman’s (Collegeville, PA) @ Home – 12:26 p.m.
Mr Sproule stood in this year’s County Council elections in Lichfield North and polled 337 votes in what was a first time out for the BNP in that town.
After every lawsuit, experts give many recommendations for domestic companies to improve their defence. In your opinion, how have Vietnamese producers improved so far?
May this be a month that showers each one of us with blessings. And may we be wise and humble and grateful enough to acknowledge the source.
It’s a park near my home when I was a child. It’s we’re all the local families would only very occasionally gather with their children on a Sunday evening on those late and fading summer days.
A poet is always easy to spot;
None of the idle aristocrats who vie for Simone’s attentions know about her past. To them, she is the sophisticated, worldly widow known as the “Wicked Temptress.” The truth would ruin her, and she has never been tempted to reveal it until now. Yet beneath Gideon’s bold, black-eyed stare is a hunger that demands satisfaction and complete surrender…and a secret far more dangerous than her own…
Meanwhile, for all of the fantastic names created by talented marketing teams, there is an immeasurable tower of cringe-worthy names. To start off, look no further then the name of Sprint’s iteration of Samsung’s Galaxy S II smartphone: the Sprint Samsung Galaxy S™ II, Epic™ 4G Touch. Really? Really? If you’re going to include all of that, you might as well have thrown in how much RAM it has, the size of its battery, and its screen resolution. I mean, the name is so ridiculous, it makes you wonder if Samsung and Sprint are collaborating on some evil joke.
For now though, vital statistics:
I personally Heart food magazines because it takes a lot less time to find an appealing recipe, than in the traditional cookbook. Why? Pictures of course! If I am visually drawn to a photo of food, then I will be a lot more apt to make it, vs trying to read through picture-less recipes for specific ingredients, which is far too time consuming for this gal.
I had been wanted to read this book for some time. I ended up getting it to listen to on audiobook at one of Audible's book sales. It was an okay book, while there wasn't anything technically wrong with the story I had a lot of trouble engaging with the story or the characters.
Technical note - produced on a new computer with some different software, file may be less loud than usual. We will address this in future.
Keep on medium flame and fry till the stickiness of the okra disappears and gets cooked well.
Turton said South African dams also had one of the highest loads of microcystins in the world.
Technical specs :
So there you have it. The thought of non-stress tests and the (potential, yet unlikely)outcome, and that dang chair totally FREAK me out. Thankfully when I joked with our doctor at our last appointment about me coming in for the NST as long as he would bring the brown paper bag for me to breath into, he just reassured me and told me we could do the typical, check baby's heart rate and measure, check-up prior to the NST to hopefully give me some comfort. And your daddy is planning on being there tomorrow (and hopefully for all of them) which is a really good thing.
d. I don’t know
We’re a couple of codependents, like the span over Pontchartrain.
offers this
Frustrated, I contemplated how to know what we were actually working with.
My purpose here is to discuss the meaning of the word μονογενής (monogenes) as used in the New Testament, the Septuagint, and in other ancient writings. I am especially interested in its use by the Apostle John in his Gospel and in his first Epistle, and its use in the Nicene Creed of A.D. 325. I will argue that the rendering “one and only” is semantically reductionistic and theologically inadequate.
I find myself smiling at total strangers
Gallup found a 66% to 26% margin in favor of alternative energy among all Americans last year, the first time the question was asked.
miraculously circumstance had been captured alive they would have exhibited a similar fanaticism and a similar disregard for human life. Their hatred would’ve burned just as brightly as Breivik’s. The same could also be said for the London bombers and every other jihadist who think nothing of killing innocent
toward the sun
I woke up this morning and just like last week; there were reports of bombings in the Northern part of Nigeria. I am Nigerian, and so there was no way I could ignore that. I responded to a tweet my cousin wrote about it. I felt his pain… and I imagined how the people who were directly affected would feel.
Eureka
God, how he wanted to. But as much as he’d love to spend the rest of the night exploring every inch of her body, he couldn’t take the chance he might go zombie on her right in the middle of sex. Talk about coitus interruptus, And it had already been almost four days since he last turned, which meant he was already pushing his luck.
It was my brave mother in law who saved the day for us, and it was her on the phone.
I just got home from packing up the show ... I'm bushed.
4. Caristiona (No. 1 of 'Two Hebridean Sea Poems') 9:31
Remember that every person you meet in life is like a book. The cover is always designed to be pretty and attractive to impress. Even our cover is such. The material of any person in life is only realized over time and several pages later. Give time for every relationship to grow. Picking up any book cover that catches your fancy could leave you with a burden of a lot of bad material and time analyzing them. Reading one book at a time will give you the wisdom over time to know what to look for in a book sooner.
WITNESS: My name is Susan!
clothes here are by local designers and feature lots of jersey knit warp dresses and fun tops that work well for layering (a necessity right now as we can’t seem to break past 55˚). The prices are spot on with almost everything under $100. I saw a cute patterned flippy black and white skirt for $48 but just can’t think about short yet. I haven’t even packed away my sweaters!
On the Thursday afternoon he was quite animated,excitedly describing being shown the action of inserting ones arm up the cows jacksy to establish condition.Farmer Giles had then invited him to perform the procedure himself , he had willingly obliged.
Making Reality: This is the very first post I had ever written on here. I think it’s insane. It’s NOT told from my POV. It’s told from the POV of a woman who eventually sleeps with Jon Gosselin from Jon and Kate, Plus 8. I’m serious. I was so “challenged” when I first started blogging that I didn’t even include a picture. It’s all story, no image. But, I promise, it’s a fun read.
Michael:” Do you remember the name Thiago?”
A few short hours later, I received a text message. A text message that freaked. me. out. It came from a charting client of mine, whom I very rarely see, but who has been a source of inspiration to me when I need it most.
The 26-year-old had threatened the girl, saying that if he had to fill out a report on the matter it would affect her chances of getting a loan and future career prospects.
The heart is deceitful above all things — who can know it?
A girl's gotta have dreams, que no?
I'm linking this to "Finding Joy in My Kitchen's" Best recipes of 2011, because to me this really is one of them!
You can contact me back here (spike222@e-mail.ua)
Just play a simple melody
They also had busy schedule here in Beijing. I did not do anything together with them , since the moment I got home, my back completely failed me . I was in deep deal of pain and only managed to clean and cook.. But They had fun. They got to see what they wanted to see ( it is easier for them to navigate in Beijing, since they speak Chinese..duh)..lol. When they left, I felt sad :(
Be sure to have a look at the reproduction on the back wall ("The Bitter Draught" by Adriaen Brouwer). Then get back to your beer.
Oddly enough, much of my knowledge of theoretical physics has been supported by existential philosophy, and vice versa. I don’t claim to be an expert in either, but I can readily see the connections. Thus, my reading of The Consolation of Philosophy in my freshman-year western culture seminar fundamentally changed my perception of what time travel might consist of.
By authority of Brigadier-General Beauregard, commanding the Provisional Forces of the Confederate States, we have the honor to notify you that he will open the fire of his batteries on Fort Sumter in one hour from this time. We have the honor to be, very respectfully, your obedient servants, James Chestnut, Jr. Aide-de-Camp.
The pleasure is when you reach a place you have never been before, and someone you never seen before asks you for a side and comes back grinning.
'In a novel you’re exploring a period of time in great depth. You can take your time building up to an emotional punch. With shorter fiction you’re stripping out everything extraneous to that punch and getting there faster.'
Pretty ironic that a post about productivity has been killed by procrastination. I guess the lesson here is that, if you want to get something done, don't go and buy Starcraft 2.
Save $0.50 when you buy ONE 28 OZ. OR LARGER Bisquick Baking Mix or Complete Pancake & Waffle Mix.
I think my own personal experiences – of bereavement and depression, for example – were a much stronger influence than my research work. But I’m fascinated by the human brain, how it works and what can go wrong. I love reading about developments in neuroscience and I’m sure some of the inspiration for ‘Chloe’ came from there.
Meow Meow is the embodiment of intellectual eroticism, supple and perilous as a flame: you'd have to have a heart of mud to resist a show that carelessly folds Richard Wagner, Walter Benjamin, The Magnetic Fields, Laurie Anderson and Noel Coward into one heady mixture. The energy of its theatricality is sparked by continuous contrast, which Peter Brook once claimed to be the basis of all theatre: at one moment, it is all heart-breaking poignancy; in the next, all heartlessness. Irresistible.
In short, there’s not a moment to lose in helping clients plan for the changes ahead.
I kept wanting to care, so I could find the heartlessness actually painful. I wanted my heart to go with them, so the satire could have bite. when we watch Homer Simpson fuck up, we laugh, but on some level, we still like or relate to him. he represents things we care about. these people really didn't, most of the time.
In closing, Job was not mistaken, and we shall not be mistaken if we follow his example, in accepting all God’s providential dealings as from Himself. We may be sure that they will issue in ultimate blessings; because God is GOD, and therefore:
Ok, so maybe that’s a silly example, but it’s not too far off from what our kids go through when they have difficulty with communication or expressive vocabulary. One way to help them while they are learning words is to offer choices. Holding 2 objects up close to your face, saying the choices, and helping your child look at/point to/attempt to label his selection is one way to use this strategy. Here are some other ways you might offer choices throughout your day:
It is said that knowledge is power. This power grants us the ability to think for ourselves, to have all pieces of the puzzle before us, and most importantly, to make choices that are most beneficial to us. Take, for instance, the Greek, Prometheus, who stole fire (knowledge) from Zeus and gave it to the people. This was an act of love that essentially demonized Prometheus.
We made this chart with "magic ink" and a Q-tip. Just dilute bleach with water and use a Q-tip as your pen! The shiny side of the construction paper doesn't work as well as the other side, so check out your "magic ink" before the kids come!
I would like to say that there is absolutely nothing wrong with buying something and making it pretty. There’s no rule that says you have to make everything yourself. For example, tie a fancy silk ribbon around a really good slice of cheese from your favorite cheese shop and present it with pride along with a bottle of nice wine.
Introducing Writer Beware's Small Presses Page: A new section of the Writer Beware website that provides an overview of issues to consider when submitting to small presses, as well as tips to evaluate publishers and warnings about unsavory practices.
He told me he didn't have to be to work til 10 the next morning due to some meeting or something at work but I didn't even pay attention because I was upset. So we got up in the morning and I was still mad at him so I didn't say anything. He asked me if I wanted to go out to have breakfast since he had the morning off so I reluctantly said yes. We ended up at Cracker Barrel where my anger began to fade because we were having a good time. We had a delicious breakfast and it started POURING rain as we were leaving so he went to get the car and picked me up in the front. As we started driving away he said he had forgotten his cell phone so we had to turn around. We just got droids a couple months ago and I'm still intrigued by the fact that I have internet on my phone now, so I was playing around on it when there was a knock on my window.
I started knitting as soon as I got home, no messing about with tension squares, I just launched straight in. The two T-shaped pieces of knitting were thrown together with much more enthusiasm than expertise and, of course, the yarn was too thin for the needles. My joe was very definitely on the sloppy side, but that didn't matter; I’d experienced the irresistible alchemy of taking a long straight piece of yarn and turning into something else. And since then, there’s never been a time when somewhere in the house I haven’t had a bag of wool, a stack of needles, a pile of patterns and a half finished piece of magic.
Here's a youtube video I found. I got some great video from our event but just haven't uploaded them yet maybe I will get to that next week. Robin, Duck and Owl were so impressed that these kids were jumping over beams taller than them with no spring board, it was AWESOME! We have one more tournament next weekend to finish out the spring season! WE have done a lot of nature studies these past 2 weeks and the littles can all recognize a Robin and a Morning Dove by sound when outside. Robin worked on some projects for our American girl study on Kirsten. She drew pictures of the Meadowlark, Black eyed Susan and Daisies. Kirsten spotted these while walking to Olav's farm. We also researched Cholera since Kirsten's friend died on the boat from it. We also did some candle dipping at our AG club with natural beewax.
10. The number of British people travelling abroad to commit assisted suicide is very small (150 in ten years) compared to numbers in countries and US states that have legalised assisted suicide or euthanasia.
Again, she just called his nickname by happen.
So, they gave her to us in a cardboard box with air-holes in it.
Yet, it's her story too - how she both did and didn't live it out for me - that had impact on my heart. Because of her, and even all of the places she hurt me, helped to shape the woman I am today.
Cheers! xoxoxo Eila
The sauced steaks came with rather large bowls of fried potatoes, which I’m sure were just as low-calorie as the buttery, garlicky sauce we dipped them into. Fortunately, we had icy cold beer on tap to wash it down.
Rated PG.
I had to go along to the launch at Edinburgh’s trendy Stockbridge Tap, because it was an opportunity to see the full Knops line-up on draught at once, and I’ll probably never get the chance again to tell a brewer that his beer isn’t a proper Black Cork at all (I’m not really bothered by this in the slightest. If I’ve learned anything from my research it’s that brewers will call any beer by any name if it will sell the stuff. It’s not like anyone living remembers the original black cork, which was only ever made by one brewery anyway).
Nevertheless, McInerney points out that there is some potential in the world of Pinot Grigio. It may not be returning to favor anytime soon, but it once was en vogue and it just may be worth taking a second glance.
A representative from SM Entertainment stated, “Fitting ‘MAMA’, the perfect dance moves that the members pull off are enough to cause wonder. The powerful and trendy performance multiplies EXO’s charm.”
Politically minded reviewers have called the Palin character “narcissistic.” You can find support for that theory in the real-life Sarah Palin, certainly. But I don’t think you can find it in this movie. This Palin isn’t self-aggrandizing; she’s needy. She bases her self-concept entirely on how other people react to her. When she watches Tina Fey portray her on Saturday Night Live, she’s mortified; when she sees people criticizing her on the news, she breaks down. When it gets really bad, she can’t speak, or look anyone in the eye; she just folds in on herself and stops functioning. And when she’s trying to stave off a breakdown, she’s stuck in a petty rage that no doubt feels like strength; she hates the world that hates her, because that’s her only way to convince herself that they’re wrong, that she still has worth.
too bad hiding the cable and tv cords isn't so simple.
Over. and Over. and Over.
Progress on the Diamond Jet continues at a deliberate pace, even though funding is lean for the research and development, says Peter Maurer, president and CEO of Diamond Aircraft. However, using the third proof-of-concept aircraft, along with static test articles and iron bird mock-ups, several critical challenges have been overcome.
In a December 2009 review, Fannie Mae officials estimated that cutting loan balances would cost about $1.7 million to implement and taxpayers would see a potential savings of more than $410 million. More than half of Fannie Mae customers would benefit from the program within six months.
Episode 8:
“One of the reasons we are offering May start degrees is to provide a service for a neglected section of the education and training space – the adult worker. The recent UCAS application figures showed the number of mature students appears to be falling in the wake of the 2012 fee hikes. Hopefully, our May start programmes will show there are alternatives for those looking to switch careers and get a degree before they’re financially out of reach. Mature students typically prefer to live at home and commute rather than moving into halls in far flung campuses, so by offering our degrees out of city centre locations we can make it easier for them to access and fit study around any part-time work commitments.”
Look, awards don't have to make sense. They often don't. There are controversial choices every year, inconsistent choices, bizarre choices. But this is one of the weirder ones I've ever seen. If Rodgers is the MVP isn't he also the offensive player of the year? Last I checked, he only plays on offense. Then again, if Brees is offensive player of the year over Rodgers, isn't he also the MVP over Rodgers? They play the same position. They both led their teams into the playoffs. This seems cartoonish.
She INSISTED on coming with me...and this is after staying up until all hours to see the premier of Hunger Games, and then having to drive 30+ minutes on practically ZERO sleep...
We became aware of a strange smell; not one of the highly offensive ones Teddy could sometimes be responsible for (especially after a side of beef and profiteroles), but an even more unpleasant one. Burning.
Believe it or not...Day 2 is a scrapbook page! (Not my thing at all!) There was no prize awarded today, because there were no comments. I know, I know...I have been out of the loop for almost 4 months, so not a lot of people are stopping by anymore. Hopefully that will change. I NEED the encouragement!!! :)
There are worse things than getting a call for a wrong number at 4 a.m. – like, it could be the right number.
"The country’s 24-hour political pundit perpetual panic conflictinator did not cause our problems, but its existence makes solving them that much harder. The press can hold its magnifying up to our problems, bringing them into focus, illuminating issues heretofore unseen — or they can use that magnifying glass to light ants on fire and then perhaps host a week of shows on the sudden, unexpected dangerous flaming ant epidemic. If we amplify everything we hear nothing." Jon Stewart's closing remarks at The Rally To Restore Sanity
When George Bailey, in It’s a Wonderful Life, sees his life like he wasn’t born, he runs into Mary, the librarian, who is an old maid.
Forgive the headline writers and “science” writers, if you desire. I do. They’re human, and crazy comes with being human – sometimes. But listen with special attention to the scientists who have taken up this word “ever” themselves. Being human as well they quickly noted the power that the word “ever” carries with the public, and started to echo the very science articles that once carefully set out their own complete analysis, imperfect as it was. When a climate scientist uses the word “ever,” and they do so routinely and increasingly, understand that this has to do with aesthetics, at a minimum, like those governing Handel’s awesome Messiah, and, potentially, with something less forgivable: a purposeful desire to mislead.
Last week, the Publican (that’s me) came down with a mild cold, and the usual dreary symptoms, combined with a long overdue need to just stop for a few minutes, damn it, and take a deep breath … well, it seemed to suggest an opportune time to finally … at long last … after two or more years … sit down and go through the Pizzeria & Public House’s supposedly fabled beer list, item by item.
In the mean time my daughter turned me on to the Naked Drinks sometime last year + the Green Machine in particular really helps to give me a little boost + granted it looks like slime, but my daughter said "no try it - it's so good" + and I was WOWED by the taste + it's fantastic + and it's a great way to get a serving of fruits and vegetables into my diet. So far I've tried the Blue Machine, Mighty Mango, and Berry Blast...but there are several varieties including Fruit & Oat Smoothies, and Coconut Water, that I'm definitely going to try.
"No flowers. No pink".
And as the adult that I am, I find myself pretty obsessed with nut butters of all persuasions. Sesame tahini, cashew, pumpkin seed, almond, hazelnut…the list goes on. Nut butters are versatile, working their magic in everything from savory to sweet, and adding a richness and high satiety factor to just about any meal. Happily, grocery stores are now providing many options beyond the peanut version these days, but of course, I prefer to make it myself at home. Like many of the “DIY” foods here at My New Roots, making your own nut butter is, I must say, disappointingly easy. One ingredient. A little roast, a quick blend. Bob’s your uncle. What’s the payoff you ask? Besides feeling pretty darn self-righteous, you get to enjoy something that I confidently wager, is better than any store-bought version you’ve ever tasted. In fact, I promise you that it is. And, you can control the ingredients by selecting the finest nuts, roasting them just the way you like, and adding only the things you want. There won’t be any refined sugars, hydrogenated fats or stabilizers lurking around in your nut butter. Heavens no!
I had a very busy weekend and am still a bit wiped out. I almost cried when the alarm went off this morning, and spent the day fighting an "I'm tired" headache. I didn't think I'd be able to make it through my aerobics class, so I played hookey and went to Joann's. I had gotten what I needed and was wandering around in that aimless way I do when I'm shopping while tired and head achy when this little kid almost plowed into me while I was nearing the end of an aisle. He says to me, dead serious, "Watch out down there," pointing towards the aisle he just emerged from, and then ran for it. Naturally (or probably not naturally because it's a weird conclusion to jump to) I thought "Oh man, did he take a whiz in the aisle?" But no. He just wanted to warn me against this:
One of the most fascinating characters in the novel is Commandant Dan Gallagher. Intelligent, brave, charismatic, ruthless, Gallagher will stop at nothing to bring about his goal which is the bringing the about of an armed revolution. But first Gallagher is more concerned with catching and dealing with the informer. When Gallagher and Gypo meet, their clash of personalities and subsequent outcome, is outstanding.
(3 gifts my own)
sweet vocals, simply the best instrumentation, tastefully
Someone else came up with this idea so all credit to them and none to me, but this is an idea that struck my fancy. If you get all three options (WA: 2800) and your war assets are high enough (say around 3400) then a fourth option should pop up; an option to refuse. From there you can watch as all the work you did either pays off or falls to pieces.
10. We need to work out the crew plan at both ends.
Despite all the hits, Dunn made relatively little money from his Stax years. "I always look back and say I should have made more," he said in an interview. "It should have been more lucrative, but it wasn't.
I have to admit you probably need to have quite a large amount of nuttiness to make this from scratch, since you can buy the ready-made stuff in well-stocked Italian delis, but the ego boost you get by creating this yourself is definitely worth the effort.
Saturday, 5/26: You guessed it. If it’s market day, it’s fish day.
‘It was a few months ago. He was attacked and killed while doing his deliveries. Uncle Edward came to Larchfield for Alycea and I. He brought us to Clarendon and that’s when I found the letters you had sent Peter. As soon as I heard those merchants mention your name and the White Oak I knew I had to come here. I will take you to Uncle Edward’s bakery, mother. We can leave together.’
Mass/Organizational/Speech Communication,
home she found her daughter healed. She didn’t act on mere optimism or impulse
PLEASE make sure it goes back in the plastic bag so they dont get damaged in weather.
I wish I was a better blogger. That way, I would have all these pictures of my boot girls coming in the shop to show me how great their boots have lasted. During the summer, we have this mother and daughter that visit every year and are as sweet as can be. I painted a pair of boots and some jeans for her years ago (we weren't even Rowdy Maui at that time!) and she comes in each summer and lets us know her daughter is still rockin' those boots. Her daughter does alot of rodeo events, so you know those boots have been through alot! I swear this summer I will finally ask her to send me a picture. Pinky promise!!!
* "The Oval Portrait" by Edgar A. Poe
Triple bonus factor ... we had the BEST conversations there and back... she was able to ask me some questions on things/events that had been on her mind and I was able to answer honestly and I can hardly even describe the joy I felt that we were having the conversation. It was like all walls and filters were removed and we were able to talk right to each others hearts. The knowledge that it was a divine appointment was clear, from finding the right dress for an amazing price to sharing the experience together to having conversations that were timely and amazing. As I was sharing with her and answering questions it was like I was receiving all sorts of revelations at the same time for myself.
Have you vouched to never fly again for environmental reasons ("Refuse")? or have you opted to "Reduce" air travels instead?
But isn't it fun now to see all the leaves
Yet with education reform, prominent liberals treat it as acceptable and instead turn the traditional liberal analysis of “special interests” on teachers unions instead.
Now for writing news. My intended goals have been shelved and that's okay. I'm not good at forcing creativity. The new shiny I mentioned before is patiently waiting and I really hope to begin working on it again before the summer is over.
He did that every day for about 40 years.
And a lot of people believe that the 17-mile long super-collider of the CERN project is meant to do that very same thing. Sometimes I wonder if what this is is actually a kind of interdimensional welcome center. Note the octagonal shape..
One of the most obvious signs that you notice when you’re ageing too fast is when you turn on the news the first thing in the morning to give you a jolt for the day ahead. It has been quite a few jolts that I have received in the past month. On one occasion I almost had a heart attack after being told that even the English paper had been leaked.
Aracelis Girmay’s second book, Kingdom Animalia, is also nominated, and it turns out she’s a Santa Ana girl, just like me, which makes me positively proud and green with envy. If this first book is as good as I’ve heard, she can count on another purchase at the awards reading.
Unbelievable. “Angry? Sorry? Those words have no meaning for me, Sweetheart. I’m way beyond angry, and your apology is dogshit. It’s easy to say sorry when you’re sitting there without a collar wrapped around your throat, without pain coursing through your body."
This is what 5 a.m. looks like.
Front Loader
I must say, the Anti-Smoking Campaign has made incredible strides since its inception. In the city I live in there’s hardly a public space that allows smoking anymore. Gone are the designated smoking areas in restaurants, airplanes, dance clubs, pubs, etc. Apparently smoking was allowed in movie theatres. That seems so seedy. Even as a smoker I would’ve protested that. All I need to fulfill the movie-going experience is a big bag o’ buttered popcorn and a ridiculously large version of a “regular” size soft drink. Not that much healthier, but still. And every once in awhile I happen upon an unrenovated public restroom that still has ashtrays in its stalls. Which actually isn’t that far-fetched of an idea since smoking does help you move your bowels. Oh, and it helps rid one type of stink with another type of stink.
I've mentioned it to people quite frequently through my life.
APRIL
all there is to life
3. People driving dangerously around cyclists, particularly me, and particularly when vehicle being driven is a lorry, and person driving is a nobhead.
As it relates to today's ad, I especially like second 22.
… and I fell short of the 15 blog mark but I hope that’s okay.
At that point I thought the card was going very well, but it definitely needed something else. I looked around and thought maybe I could spray it with Smooch. So I quickly made a "sample" card and sprayed it with the Vanilla Smooch from SU!. (there was no way i was going to try that spray on this card because I really loved how it was coming along and we ALL know what happens when we go too far ... disaster!!!) It was ok, but it really washed out the darker spots on the card and turned the ink drops into a funny greenish gray.
Yeah, like that happens.
So, I've tweaked the original content and am sharing it with a smile and a thankful heart now. The pictures are unrelated to the story - just inserting visual beauty and peace.
-fresh garlic
Well, we finally got out. My former neighbor could not make it, he had a tooth come out and needs to see the dentist. We drove up the Logan Canyon a bit, pulled into a camping area with fire rings, gathered wood, talked quite a bit, cooked brots and such, and then ate. My newer friend is a bit uptight, I think. He needs to learn how to relax, I mean really relax. He is always on edge. I wondered if it was his program, he is working on his doctorate. But I am beginning to think it is just him. If we get together, I think I might be able to show him how to take life as it comes. I stress on some things, but no longer allow myself to twitch at everything, or even most things. He sometimes thinks a snapping branch is somehow aimed at him. No, I am not laughing, mostly. I have been there, done that, and quit it over time.
Indeed America has embraced Jung’s train of thought, but is this the dangerous method the film is titled after? Is trying to save people dangerous? By keeping ones distance such as Freud’s theory and practice does it is easy to live one’s own life uncomplicated by patients. Jung fails hopelessly however in trying to heal Sabrina, in fact one could say he only messes her up more.
And you're just along for the ride
Some time later with no callback, Jon called again and this time the message actually got through. So, with me in the dink with both hands free to play with the motor, and Jon on the phone talking to the shop guy, we began a three-way diagnosis/repair effort. Emergency stop lanyard in place. Check. Fuel bulb squeezed. Check with explanation of cleaning the fuel lines and checking the sparkplug. Give it a try. Ok. Nothing. Nothing. Sputter. Sputter. Start. Running rough but running. There’s my Voodoo. Scientifically, I’m gonna say it was the crap in the fuel line that clogged things up originally and the rest the carburetor got after I cleaned the lines and waited for their callback is what allowed the motor to run again.
I Use 2 Come Through The (House) On The Handle Bars (Johnson gave me a dink on his pushbike)
As it folds and fondles Sin
Freedom of religion, like most freedoms afforded to citizens of the civilized western world, is an individual freedom. What does that mean? It’s actually very simple. An individual freedom is one I can apply to my own life, not one I can force other people to apply to their lives. If I did, I would be interfering with their right of freedom of religion! In regards to religion, it means each one of us can:
What were the main differences you encountered from filming a movie compared to acting on stage?
April was Script Frenzy (and the first month in well over a year that did not have a blog post). So I’ve been doing a lot of writing elsewhere. The script idea popped into my head a long time ago and I was really anxious to get started. I did some basic outline, decided on a plot arc, three sections. I was ready to “hit the ground running” as they say.
Thank you for any comment postes in regards to thius subject.
I recommend Violet in Bloom to people who have girl drama. What I liked best about Lauren Myracle is that she wants to encourage kids to stop bullying each other! Something else I liked was Camilla's crush, aka Max, has an "I Read Banned Books" shirt.
Money cant buy everything, but without money, we are feeling lack of security, especially when we have desires, but cant be fulfilled as we are running out of cashes. for normal working class, we only enjoy the happiness once a month, and that happiness only last for 24 hours.
The same man was present on Saturday, after warning months earlier that Middle East-style protests could hit South-East Asian countries if the reforms were delayed.
Mr. Sapiens: I guess I would need to drink more water and add more fluids to my diet then?
Who cared? Not one of them could hear us anyway.
1. I believe that dairy is unhealthy for humans to consume, I think that it just seems wrong for me to drink cows breast milk because I am not a calf. Imagine if I was feeding a calf my breast milk....Also I believe that factory farming is cruel and unethical. It is a big factor in childhood obeseity, heart disease and high colesterol. Milks selling point is high levels of calcium and protein, but sea vegetables, leafy greens and nuts have significantly higher amounts.
This book spoke to me. I have never been diagnosed with depression but so many of the things that she was saying I could relate too. I was also understanding for the first time how my sister's mind works. (She was diagnosed with bi-polar some years ago)
Peanut Butter Mushrooms
CPJ now considers Pakistan to be the deadliest country in the world for reporters. As a result of this danger, self-censorship has increased, particularly on sensitive topics like blasphemy laws and the role and reach of the security forces.
Here’s what you need to make the bread – good news – its probably all stuff you already have in your cupboard/garden! Just a note on the quantities – I halved Paul’s original recipe as it made two loaves – the resulting focaccia was exactly perfect for two people for dinner. If you want to feed more
My hobby in photography has started into it's second year and I am still eager to learn everything I can about it, especially the post-processing end of things. I attended a week-long workshop in October and I am scheduled for a shorter one next month. My Christmas present to myself was a new computer, a high-end monitor with color calibration software, and a large Wacom tablet and pen (which I haven't used yet). I am hoping that I will have some time to become familiar with all this stuff during the Christmas holidays. Then maybe, I'll be able to post more often on the blog in the coming year.
Father: Unknown
“How?” You may ask.
To enter, complete the below form by midnight, March 31, 2012. Open internationally!
Am I an aspiring writer? I have written 4 books, rewritten them, and will continue rewriting them until they are perfected.
Among the issues:
Friday, May 27- Sunday, May 29, 2011
Choose a theme for the idioms you will use. Some popular themes include:
Pinocchio's Christmas ... ABC Family ... 10 AM
This was not necessarily a negative when one considers the subject matter or what the photographer was trying to achieve, which in most cases was a photographic illustration.
Matt: (Completely ignores my last statement) Why don’t you write about things you think about when you’re working out?
It is chocolate cake and chocolate (nutella) whipped cream covered with mmf (marshmallow fondant).
“Communication skills and the ability to work well with different types of people are very important too.”
I never practiced exactly how I was going to say it out loud. What came out was, “OK, close you eyes and I’m going to touch you in various places.”
Arguably one of the most recognizable nightlife centers in San Jose, Sabor, Spanish for flavor is the place to be if you are looking to dance, socialize, and meet new people. Its location towards the outskirts of downtown San Jose add to the upscale vibe they want to relay.
Like my favorite piece of Fall cycling clothing—the convertible jacket—the aero road bike can, with a little work, convert itself into a capable if not actual time trial or triathlon bike. Many companies’ aero road bikes not only take design cues for tube shapes from their TT and tri models but they also utilizes features that make the aero road bike model a capable machine against the clock. This, to my thinking, makes them ideal bikes for the passionate road cycling enthusiast. Sure the truly dedicated road racer that has a TT bike and who specializes in the late-race breakaway can likely benefit from an aero road bike. But the rider who has a budget for one bike, but wants to take on a Central Texas stage race, both road and tri races, or who simply wants another available means to go faster will undoubtedly gain more value from the aero road bike.
Rev. Tula Henson RN, BSN, BHA, MDiv. will lead a guided meditation for “Birthing the Christ Within”. This will be followed by a period of silence when you will be invited to visit the sanctuary, journal or create a soul collage to take home with you.
-water reflections and shadows
(images annechovie, brightboldbeautiful, etsy.com, ballarddesigns.com)
In addition to the relationship nastiness, I was stuck in a miserable small town in the middle of TexAss and surrounded by remarkably hostile colleagues in my work life. The small gay community that was there felt really depressing because they were so under siege.
Total Cost: $6.90
I think it was a dragon…..it might have been 4 or 5 tree frogs standing on each others shoulders….
Entered in the following challenges:
Nathan is fearless when it comes to some things. Jumping from a ridiculous height and sticking the landing? No problem. Putting on your shoes by yourself... well, for some reason he really didn't want to try to do this without help from mommy or daddy. I think it's because he is a little shy of doing things when he is not guaranteed success. After much coaxing though, last summer he did start attempting to do it himself. Even now, months and months later, he still puts his shoes on the wrong foot, often, but at least now he tries.
According to Haaretz, there only three Molotov cocktails. As of now, it appears there were no casualties.
SMACK!!!
A quick dose of Gleamhound's Sleepeazee (his wonderful concoctions always work backwards) and I soon felt wide awake and ready for action. Full of natural ingredients it has a remarkable restorative effect.
It is August.. which must mean summer vacation is over - at least for kindergarten teachers. I don't officially get started until the 16th but I've been steadily working in my classroom for about 2 weeks. My husband dropped me off at my school on Sunday and remarked that there were a few teachers also working... happened to be the four other kindergarten teachers at my school!
A couple of Tigers oddballs. What's funny is I had lots of both of these types of cards, but I don't think I had any of the Tigers, at least definitely not these two. Not bad for filling out the package.
But I see love (I see love)
"Crap, we can't get to the other side," I said. Semi's are lined up in rows glaring at us like invading parasites.
The voices sound a bit stilted - a touch Stephen Hawking - but considering I was able to put this together in a short amount of time on a budget of zero, I'm really quite impressed with the system.
So it's been crazy around here due to our snow, and by snow I mean really a lot of snow for Alabama. We had over 8 inches all across North Alabama. I know, I know my Northern friends this is not a lot in comparison to what you get, however let me point out again, this is Alabama. We (as in the state) are not prepared nor equipped for this type of snow. We have a few snow plows but not enough and when it snows here, it melts and turns into black ice. Black ice is very very dangerous, especially at night as you might imagine. Our city & surrounding counties have been closed down since late Sunday night, today is Tuesday. School has been canceled since Sunday night and is closed at least through tomorrow (Wednesday). It's quite possible it'll be closed or delayed Thursday due to the amount of snow/ice still on the roads.
We had such a Great time with everyone that came out to the GED Funk and Soul Halloween Event at the Pond last night!! Hope everyone enjoyed the Mustaches!
Tons of people say that ‘Harry Potter’ started when they were young, so the films practically raised them. They have associated it with their childhood, and now, it’s ending, which also means, goodbye childhood!
We're also used to seeing our faces straight on, not in profile, so our noses, brows and chins look like they stick out much further than we expect them to.
Listening to medical and nursing students speak about their initial prejudices and beliefs going into their work with Preparing The Future and then hearing how their experiences changed them was just incredible. It took a lot of courage for these young men and women to admit at all that they had preconceived notions of what HIV looked like and who the population they would be working with was. In the example above, it would be understandable to see how a med student would make a beeline for the disheveled black man with pneumonia or the young black MSM (man who has sex with men). I mean, if you look at the data within Baltimore City, 88% of all reported HIV cases are among African-Americans and the fastest growing group for HIV infections are young black men who have sex with men. Why would you test an elderly hispanic woman who just broke her hip going down some stairs? Old people don’t have sex…right? What about the 50-something white lawyer? Lawyers don’t get HIV. For crying out loud, the man came into the ED wearing a $3,000 Brooks Brothers suit. He couldn’t be HIV positive.
After the Gold Rush
Do you sometimes feel yourself ready to
My notes here at Karen’s LOST Notebook will continue on as well, now and pretty much forever! There’s always new things about LOST to discuss and there always will be. I will post more LOST insight as well as links to any LOST Podcasts I participate in. I am LOST and will always be LOST!
Whispered desperate words in the secret night. A plea. A bargain. If only, then I will believe again.
7.What kind of car do you drive?
Anyway, so I figured the time was right for me to replicate the grilled cheese awesomeness. Unfortunately, turns out that when you cut yourself two nice thick slices of homemade challah and stick all those toppings on there, it will take forever to cook. And it will burn the bread before it cooks the inside … so no deal.
A few of my friends (including one of my best guy friends) have gone through some difficult breakups recently, and the thing consistently astounds me is how unwilling some of their other friends were to let them have their moment of misery. Most of them jumped right into some awful variant of the “more fish in the sea” line, when what they needed wasn’t advice — everyone knows, empirically, that breaking up with someone very rarely means that you will never date or love again — they needed someone to buy them a beer or a coffee and just let them work through how awful it is to lose someone you care about. Later, in a different season, there is a time for encouragement toward joy and the reminder that there is a difference between acknowledging grief and wallowing in it, but in the heat of the recent wound, all that person needs from you as a friend is just a place where they can feel safe and vulnerable to react how they need to react.
We are being served spaghetti with olive oil and garlic and a few more wines. Time passes by and soon it’s 10pm. I really feel like going home and I also wonder how much Toni has been drinking. Surely, he’d be sober still?!
Earlier in October, we had called our very first Assemblée Générale Extraordinaire, with the purpose of asking Mr A to put things right with his neighbours by submitting a list of the works he intended to carry out, and giving us architect's plans and perhaps a quote, or other supporting documents. We also put Electing A Syndic on our agenda for the meeting. Pseudo-syndic sent out the convocation by email.
Now, the process might not be completely opaque (irony is probably well-intended) as they initially seem to have gone to these institutions ('All did Dphils at Oxford') and, we could add, the obvious explanation of class politics. Complexity is for those who can afford and enjoy it, it speaks to a certain experience of that fraction, hence the plumpes denken ('crude thought') of 'monocausal explanation' (read 'Marxism'), seems so unutterably vulgar, yet so obvious to those who don't share that 'richness'.
Once at Orly, I found the entrance to the train closed thanks to a piece of unattended luggage. The cop told us we could wait around for it to re-open, it wouldn't be too much longer. While we were all standing around, the police blew up the unattended luggage without warning us beforehand. So there was a loud explosion and some people kind of dove to the ground and others kind of crapped themselves and then the cop standing there was like, "Oh...maybe I should have mentioned that part...."
Having it on vinyl also helps the ambience factor go up. It’s the feel of pulling the LP out of the case, putting it on Side A, hearing the crackle of the record underneath the needle, as you hear the opening notes of Box of Rain, which is such a sad song but is dolled up in a way that you couldn’t tell.
There are too many to thank, so if you are reading this and are familiar with the efforts since 2006 of the elders of El Calaboz to retain customary and traditional rights to the lands in El Calaboz Rancheria, and you have been supporting this effort, then... at some point along the way you came to respond to this collective work even on your very busy path. You have helped us to support the wishes of the elders of El Calaboz in their legal, spiritual, political and social movement. El Calaboz Rancheria has a long and consistent history of indigenous peoples taking up issues of injustice, and the periodic rise of state violence in their lands.
Did that title get your attention??? I am excited and humbled to realise that my followers (all those faces on the right side bar who 'follow' my blog with Google friend connect) have exceeded 300!!! Can I just say how much I appreciate all the support and comments on this blog. It has been over 3yrs since I began this blog and what a ride it has been!! To celebrate reaching 300 followers, I'm offering this awesome X-press It/Copic Blog Candy bundle thanks to X-press Graph-x!!!
But the cops persist in busting up law-abiding gatherings with batons and pepper spray, putting the fat, stupid bastards in the news, and shining a favorable light on the people. Thanks, cops. It makes our work easier, even if it hurts for a while, and you are prancing imbeciles until you get put on administrative leave.
"Fart on my face, then I will fart on yours. OK?"
The next few designs will be 60's and 70's in style with lots of more fun designs to come so stay tuned to the blog to find out when and when.
O baby I waited ...
you don’t think i could “straighten up” a feral child? (what a disgustingly masculine phrase, eh?) you don’t think i haven’t? you don’t think i am one of those? ferals flow, without lying to themselves. if you inflict harm, you title means nothing. nothing. probably the best result of this cult of fascist violence is the understanding of its absence/adoption/admittal will ultimately provide. 9:53 pm.
“He’s the most – guy, but a total loose cannon. No one wants to set him off except for Iron Man, except for Downey, who just wants to see him pop. It’s funny, there’s a really cool dynamic between Tony Stark and Banner. Banner actually enjoys it, and finds it really refreshing. They’re a lot alike in a strange way. They’re both these kind of scientists who are mavericks, kind of renegades. Banner, for all his mild-mannered mythology, he’s still the dude who was testing some pretty crazy s–t on himself, so he has that rebel streak in him.”
She was furiously texting on her cell phone, totally engrossed in the textversation (is that a word yet?), making no eye contact with him but still somehow managed to keep talking the whole time. She held her cell phone above the table while she texted. Remember that…it’s important. He, on the other hand seemed fairly unenthused (I don’t want to say he looked bored…but he did) until he too received a text, which livened him right up! He immediately grabbed his cell phone and lowered it about six inches below the table…out of site…where only he could see it…and became equally engrossed in his textversation.
Sadly, over the weekend I was discussing the process with a very senior member of the previous administration, observing in my own inimitable style that: "The mentoring scheme is crap, always was crap, always will be crap ... a very expensive and stupid waste of money ... and by now a demonstrable failure."
We also got the story of how the sommelier at 40 Sardines (the former Leawood hotspot owned by Michael Smith and Debbie Gold pre-divorce) was their FAVORITE, and the sommelier was so good and knew them by name, and when they ate at Michael Smith they asked what happened to the sommelier, and Michael Smith said, “He’s right up the street! He opened his own shop!”, and she walked in and he was so happy to see them, and he remembered us and walked right over to pick up some of their best “buttery” Chardonnays because he knows exactly what she likes, and we just let him pick our wines because he’s so good…
They have collectively ticked off myriad roles and appearances, the chat show couches, thrillers, comedies, spinning out down the decades. In short, a lot of baggage to take on board.
Still, it’s not necessary to go to this extreme to get caught up in contemplation of what you don’t want to imitate. There are doubtless plenty of reasons why so many people in the climate change movement never got around to accepting the sharp reductions in their personal carbon footprints that they wanted to impose on everyone else, but I’ve long suspected that too much contemplation of what they thought they were fighting was one of them. There were some people in that movement who tried to sketch out visions of a low-carbon future that was more interesting and more appealing than the present, but by and large the movement presented the world with a choice between a continuation of business as usual by low-carbon means, on the one hand, and planetary dieoff on the other. The ineffective but familiar strategy of trying to get people to change by scaring the bejesus out of them—sinners in the hands of an angry Gaia!—took over from there, preaching vehemently about greedy polluters ravaging the Earth in an orgy of conspicuous consumption. The result was to make this image so powerful that a great many people in the climate change movement were drawn into contemplating it, and thus imitating it.
It’s the same seamless experience you get with Sony’s other games console, the PS3 which itself only has 256MB RAM.
I contacted Ebay and told them. Their useless automated system lurched into action.
My sensitive and inherently friendly southern nature was shocked. During our forty-five minute commute I saw hundreds of people come and go and no one spoke a single word. Teens and adults alike were plugged in to their Ipods, others were reading books or newspapers, and a few were just staring into space, but no one seemed willing to acknowledge the fact that there were other human beings on the train.
In a primary electorate almost evenly split along racial lines, Nifong faced long odds. A strong white candidate, Freda Black, enjoyed higher name recognition than the incumbent as a result of her prosecuting a high-profile murder case in 2003. The two also had a personal history: Nifong had fired Black almost immediately after becoming district attorney. Meanwhile, a black attorney, Keith Bishop, ran a desultory campaign but threatened to siphon enough African-American votes away from Nifong to ensure a Freda Black victory. By late February, the local elite had delivered its verdict: Nifong’s fundraising had dried up; personal loans to his campaign kept his candidacy afloat.
Long Island, NY
6 tbsp melted butter
Delhi is the 'missing kids' capital of India as 14 children a day go untraced in the city
1) Responding in Song was a natural thing to do.
if you look carefully, you can maybe
HEARD: I think it should have been a left back there…?
Halloween week on DWTS is usuallu one of my favourite weeks.
3 Devil's Canyon 6:18
The path was covered with dry leaves which made an irritating crackling sound under my heavy boots. The birds were not so noisy now and once in while a cricket could be heard. The trees stood like mourners in a line along the path sending shivers in my body. For a moment I thought that I was walking with Melisa’s ghost. As if sensing my thoughts, the old woman turned and smiled but her eyes remained expressionless.
Sew your rows first. I found that it’s much easier to sew the rows then sew all those rows together. For this type of quilt anyways. Every quilt is different.
The others are just as engaging. We don’t share a lot in common beyond a love of the arts and a tenderness for our pups, but that’s enough. It’s enough to make us laugh together, cheer for each other and share life.
While I could cheerfully have sacked out on the couch for the rest of the afternoon with my snuggly little daughters, it’s unwise to let them vegetate in front of the television for extended periods, so I hauled myself aloft and asked if either of them would like to do a craft. I believe they may have actually teleported into their chairs at the kitchen table, which I took as an affirmative answer, and quickly assembled a few oddments I had handy. We decided to make angels, since I had a few yards of white tulle, some fluff that looked cloudlike, and oodles of construction paper.
Looking back, it’s almost like the dog knew. He was literally snapping at potential adoptive families because he knew he would be miserable as a family pet. He knew that was not his purpose in life.
140g tropical dried fruit mixture
10. control and dumbing down of media
In a small bowl, combine the confectioners' sugar and enough milk to achieve smooth dipping consistency. Dip cookies, then roll in coconut. Place on waxed paper; let stand until set.
About the DVD
The movie dispensed with all that nonsense about the $742.30 cab ride, but it still had playboy Danny Churchill (Rooney) making a spectacle of himself in New York. "Treat Me Rough" was the song used, performed by Tommy Dorsey's band and sung by June Allyson. (Allyson was an MGM newcomer, simultaneously filming this one-shot while recreating her Broadway role in the studio's movie of Best Foot Forward. By the time Girl Crazy was released, she had already made her splash in Best Foot Forward and was on her way to major stardom.)
Here are a couple of examples of what I have made:
Pod sells Aria SG and buys yellow 1972 Fender Stratocaster after chance encounter with person at Prodigal Sound Music. As of 2008, this is still his primary electric guitar.
I have been sitting here reading through your blog and I am confused and have a question that I hope you take seriously and really reevaluate yourself a little.
The other aspect to this is that religion may find itself in serious trouble, because the Chinese do not really like religion and neither do they like the Media and so many other institutions, movements and ideologies.
New president, following an increasingly unpopular regime, is elected in a major electoral referendum as the populous wants a directional change for the country. Quickly, the new administration moves to reverse the course of the past several years and completely change the federal government’s focus. A massive stimulus package is passed within the first 100 days. The government steps in to dismantle and remake a sector of the transportation industry, to the hue and cry of a segment of the population, and it brings claims of government overreach. The President goes on the offensive to reclaim America’s prestige in the world and undoing the damage done by the previous administration, revamping relationships with both allies and enemies, and reclaiming the mantle of world leadership. The President has strong weapons: he is charismatic, a world-class orator with an easy smile and a disarming personality. Even his detractors can’t help but find him likeable, though they strongly disagree with his policies.
Take your game to the next level with the concepts discussed in this course. Learn about online tells, table image and reading
In this book, Drina gets her dream, when she is accepted into a full-time ballet school in London. There she makes some good friends and also attracts some negative attention from people who are envious of her talent. Her mother was a famous ballerina, but Drina is determined not to let anyone know because she wants to know if she can succeed on her own.
Spring Break is for relaxation and to let it all hang loose. After a long winter quarter at college and with warmer weather (and lesser clothing) all a guy wants to do is have fun and relax. You have no idea how hard it is to sit in a muggy classroom with people you loath to be around while it is sunny and in the low 80s outside. This is the time where we can enjoy the sunshine to its fullest without the burden of homework waiting for us at home. So is it wrong for me to not want to do tedious chores that don’t directly affect anyone and put them off for the upcoming month. All I want to do is sleep in late and stay up late and not worrying about boring things like having to get ready for a garage sale that is two entire months away.
Right back on track for everyone now. So many issues get addressed in this action packed book. Cults, parent-daughter relationships, life of high flying business men, a little bit of a futuristic style with some of the houses, paranormal with angels, mild teen romance, life of spies and criminals.
All things that happen after this day make me want to barf. My stupid ass birthday is in 10 days. I was supposed to be all exhausted and post partum glowy. Weddings, summer. All these things were supposed to include a newborn from here on out. I hate them all right now, I don’t want to celebrate or acknowledge the fact the world isn’t as sad as I am.
The whole entire shelving unit - garbage bags to sandwich baggies - is blockaded by pallets of shrink wrapped bottled water and potting soil. (Well, SOMEbody is planning on folks planting a rainforest and then being extremely thirsty afterward!)
~ Add in chocolate pieces and beat for another 2 minutes.
Worthington now has a mission: The President's new beer friend wants to send Oregon hops to the President for White House brewing.
I love my children more than words could ever say,
If your favorite is not listed above, meaning it is a special release none of us at the Beer Wall has had, leave a comment and let us know what is is, giving a description if you want.
Currently however, that is not the prevailing opinion. It is still treated at best, as a lapse, and at worst, as a sin! Either way, the public figure is raked over the coals for his own actions and does, in fact, harm his own reputation and, potentially, his own value to society.
Freshly ground pepper, to taste
Web search can be a remarkable tool for students, and a bit of instruction in how to search for academic sources will help your students become critical thinkers and independent learners.
Buddy Holly Everyday US
Q078) CL-san can speak 4 different languages. What are some recommended methods to study languages?
Plato said police had to take "hard-core action” against the rioters and ensure that those arrested were convicted. So far 36 people have been arrested.
Possessing and caressing me
If you are participating in Metamorphosis Monday: Please be sure to add your permalink below, and not your general blog address. To get your permalink, click on your post name, then just copy and paste the address that shows up in the address bar at the top, into the "url" box for the picture linky. You'll also need to put your e-mail address in, but don't worry, it will not be visible to anyone.
The highly competitive nature of these events begins with the arrival of the invitation. Some of us, specifically the would be losers in this game of parties, content ourselves with a group text. Others choose to replicate the business card scene from American Psycho. While both obnoxious and sickening this is at least fitting, given the carnage that tends to ensue when a large group of seven year old girls are force-fed ketchup and released into the wild.
In the meantime, I feel like I need to share this true story with you. If you’ve been following my blog for some time now (thank you, by the way!), then you know that I consider myself to be a nerd and with good reason. But you need to know that there was something that happened this past weekend that just reiterated that fact and I feel I must share with you.
Just as Stanley Greene, visitors to the exhibition are poised between the safety of Western life and the horrors of foreign wars. And it is precisely this juxtaposition that causes these photos to stir us more than the stream of bad-news images that inundate us daily. In addition, Black Passport is a fascinating story about what it is like to be a war photographer. Why does someone choose to be continually confronted with death and misery? Is it an escape from everyday reality and a craving for adventure?
American Friends Service Committee
I already know that this is probably one of the most reviled, most hated movies centering on Merian C. Cooper's 1933 creation known to modern man. Why is that? Simply put, because it is a story that really doesn't need, doesn't depend on and doesn't even care about the ape of the title - a King named Kong.
1 prevent
Personally, I see only one solution. Unfortunately, based on our beliefs, actions and attitudes, I don’t see it happening without much more pain and suffering.
When wisdom is not well developed,
Green (4): Ruth's game "Trapped in the Asylum."
Panel Moderator:
"God Only Knows" by The Beach Boys
More Than Just Making It~
Sunday 3/18:
We didn’t light any fires, but in Ireland Beltane was traditionally a festival of optimism, and there was lots of that around over the weekend. The sun finally showed its face on Sunday and any plans I’d had for a lazy morning went out the window. Nic and I got up, tidied the house, did some grocery shopping and went for a dander in the sun. It wasn’t warm enough to eat ice-cream but it did make a change from all of the rain and grey that has characterised the last few weeks. I didn’t wear one of my handmade dresses, but I thought I’d stick with the handmade theme all the same by wearing my Grace dress from Call Me Betty vintage:
Later that afternoon, I was in the middle of a meeting with Alisa and Dafna when Tal walked in, an enormous smile on his face. Moti, he said, the TCC problem is over. Immediately, my mind jumped to the rich Nepali I had met on the road. I expected Tal to tell me a millionaire had driven by, seen the men hard at work, and offered the few hundred thousand rupees they needed to pay off their debts.
It would have to try to solve them by trimming the workforce, by pushing 'flexibility' and generally undermining the conditions that union action has achieved in the industry.
"On a level with this stage there is a hop room for a few days' supply of hops, quite contiguous to the tops of the coppers. The hop-back, another copper vessel, holding 120 barrels, to which the wort now runs, is placed over the coolers in the next building, and contains gun-metal draining plates.
We are in the infancy of the craft beer movement in Chicago. The industry is booming in the Second City with no end in sight. Breweries are popping up in every neighborhood, store shelves are stacked high with plenty local options and foodies are learning that the complexity found in beer lends to pairing with food as good as (or better than) wine.
While we believe that online piracy by foreign websites is a serious problem that requires a serious legislative response, we will not support legislation that reduces freedom of expression, increases cybersecurity risk, or undermines the dynamic, innovative global Internet.
So which group is the greedy one? Which group is using institutions to control society?
So on Thursday, as we made the 2-hour drive south, we had already stopped twice for potty breaks. We were on the home stretch, only 15 minutes from out destination. That’s when I heard Ben say, “I have to go potty SO BAD!” Grrrr… Dave says, “You just went 30 minutes ago, can’t you hold it?” Then the panicking starts. “It’s gonna come out! I can’t hold it!” Folks, there was no place to pull over. So, I quickly scanned the contents of the car and my eyes fell on a Panda Express Cup. I grabbed it, took the lid off, and told Ben to pee in the cup. He’s done it before, so he knew the drill.
Maybe you just want to stay here a moment and invite the Shepherd to speak to your heart about the path you are on…
To drink from the wine-breath
The DrZap version is binaural, while this version is mono. The DrZap version is very clean, but is lacking somewhat in the low end. This version, while not as clean, is still very good, with better low end. Both tapers were using C-90 cassettes, as evidenced by the fact that both versions have a tape flip during "City Of Tiny Lights". DrZap's flip occurs during a lyric, and is missing a line or two. This version was flipped a bit earlier, during an instrumental portion of the song. The splice in this version is virtually un-noticeable.
that Laura’s been really freaked out by. We’re supposed to be a civilized society and we’re regressing into a situation where these things are actually on the political agenda… insanity.
Philips revealed the benefits of the AirFloss technology which “fires a microburst of air and water between teeth at 45mph to remove plaque”.
In sum: the sloppiness of the final cut-scene's composition and execution which is why the end is an artistic failure. I understand some arguments that say it is because Shepard's story is at an end and we're not supposed to see the consequences of his choice. I understand but disagree because the ending violates basic narrative demands for a richer exploration of the ramifications of his choice.
I do not have the stress of deadlines or commitments to meetings or anything else in life that needs something from me. And I like it! But inside there is a voice that whispers "But is this OK?"
I am blessed.
And there's this awesome way to layer the Picket Fence Distress Stain with the other 36 colors - I explain it all in my review on Craft Test Dummies. This gorgeous, shimmery piece of Kraft Resist paper is all ready to add to a card front or some other project.
also I can't wait to show you some pictures from my FABULOUS new job at Viva Las Vegastamps! It's so wonderful.. I love every day :)
It reminded me of those multiple stabbings you hear about in the news. “So and so was found dead today with 326 stab wounds…”. And there you are, sitting there, thinking to yourself: “…well, that’s a bit excessive, ain’t it?” And excessive it was.
Michelle Malkin hits the nail on the head, explaining that ex-Congressman Anthony Weiner is a wretched (but not unusual) example of the modern politician – a life spent mooching from the public, lining his pockets while making life harder for people in the productive sector of the economy. And every time people like Weiner (including many GOPers) expand the burden of government, that further enriches and empowers the political elite at the expense of real America.
My points were these:
I wish you all a Merry Christmas, Happy Holidays, and may you find peace, love and happiness in 2012.
And yet an undeniable menace lurked inside the word. Being called a “fag” meant that you were weak, an easy target….in short, a girl. But the word’s true menace, I now realize, arose from its inchoate intimation of sex. Real sex. Fucking. It was more than an insult. “Jerk” was an insult. “Fag” was a cage that boys built around other boys, one that was intended to stand between the alleged fag and true manhood. A boy in the cage would never be permitted to experience the glories of fucking. Instead, he would be fucked. Like a girl. My mistake, my fatal blind spot, was that I didn’t see the cage being built. I just wanted to play the flute; I liked the way it sounded and looked. In my 6th-grade naiveté, I didn’t realize that it was a girl’s instrument and that boys of my age should not play with girly things.
Partly they listen because that strident voice, warm and keen and articulate, and ever so slightly like a champion junior debater, is very hard to tune out. Her view of Watson’s suggestion that Murdoch Senior was not fit to run an international company is expressed, as ever, in bracingly forthright terms: It’s “froth”, she says, and not just froth, but “fatally undermining” to the report’s impact. Watson, in her view, is guilty of propagating “partisan tripe”.
More oil than is already visible could be entering the Loop Current, which could carry it past the Florida Keys and up the Atlantic coast.
I'm submitting this to the Split Coast Stamper's Ways to Use It Challenge, WT349 Baby It's Cold Outside.
I love streamlining my life, so naturally, the concept of Project Ten Pan intrigues me. But between excavating my lipstick graveyard earlier this year (this post) and finally having acquired the discipline to buy only items that work well for me, Project Ten Pan for my makeup bag seems pointless. But then I asked myself, "Well, what about your medicine cabinet then? Why not play Project Ten Pan with your unloved skincare loot?"
Number 2 – Robert Frank
From the second half of the 20th Century, the Wellcome Trust has continued to fund malaria-related research across the world, and ‘combating infectious disease’ remains a key part of the Wellcome Trust’s strategy today. In the last two decades specifically, the Wellcome Trust has provided over £189m for malaria research, representing 3 per cent of the Trust’s total spend over this time period. An additional £120m was allocated for core support and infrastructure funding at Wellcome Trust Centres and the Trust’s MOPs – much of which has facilitated malaria-related research – with a further £8.8m committed to malaria-related pathogen and genome sequencing at the Wellcome Trust Sanger Institute.
then Amnon hated her exceedingly
For the focal image I blended blue and green PanPastels on the card and then stamped with archival ink. Using the Sofft blending tools and a rubber I 'painted' the main image. Now I see it photographed, I realise I should have tried some of my team mate Claire's clouds on it. Mmmm must remember that next time.
Students Representative Council (SRC) president Amanda Ngwenya said that although the incident has been well covered by the media, the UCT community needed to recognise what had happened.
A girl can never have enough nailpolish, right?
Serves 4 as a side dish.
* = The whole operations thing is horrible, especially as a kid. But the worst thing about my trip to St. George’s in Tooting for that particular snip was franchise-clown Ronald McDonald getting in the same lift as me and trying to entertain the scared-shitless kid. Fuck off, Ronald. I was terrified. And take your obvious metaphor for health service privatisation away with you. Twat.
Today would have been my 33rd wedding anniversary, but I lost my husband, Rob to suicide in Dec. 2000. So this day holds extra special meaning for me not only because it was my anniversary, but because it reminds me of who I lost and how many are impacted by this tragedy of suicide.
I very gently told her that, what she had just done was 400 times worse for her health than, being outdoors where some people were smoking. I also told her that was the reason I could not find acceptable any criticism that she can do about.
When Ringelberg and Moore County sheriff’s deputies arrived, they found three dead pit bulls and one still alive. All four animals were chained up in the backyard of the home, according to an incident report. The living dog had no food or water.
Nubar Diamont Seal & Shine Topcoat
I’ve actually been told I should just move to Europe and find some royal to marry, and I do admit that I sometimes imagine what it would be like to live the life of a princess, like Victoria or Mette-Marit – I once even made up an imaginary country so I could be its princess. (I told you I’ve gone a little too far with the princess thing.) But Jerramy went way beyond that. She tracked down a (minor) member of the British Royal Family in the hopes that he’d marry her. Her tenacity – even if she chooses to ignore some of the more “sensible”-ish people around her – is something to aspire to.
Although he has shared the stage with some of the very top bluegrass musicians (dobro star Jerry Douglas was a member of his band for several years, and Ricky Skaggs is his son-in-law), White is really an example of a performer who comes to bluegrass by way of other genres. As he mentions in talking with Glaser, growing up in Texas, he wasn’t surrounded by bluegrass. A lot of the influences that shaped his music were more homegrown, which of course means he was exposed to a healthy dose of Texas swing. Here’s an example of that infectious musical style from The Whites main stage set at Joe Val. Buck is joined here by daughters Cheryl (bass) and Sharon (guitar). The tune is “My Window Faces the South,” a song popularized by Bob Wills and the Texas Playboys.
then fell laughing on all fours after it was gone.
Nicki and Tracy have been meeting a journalist today.
The papers are from Echo Park (blue patterned) and My Little Shoebox (dark pink, yellow). I used dimensional squares to pop the top layers up from the base. I inked everything on this tag! Here are the inks I used: Colorbox (Chianti, Amber) and CTMH (Lagoon). I used a sponge to apply a light layer of Glossy Accents and then sprinkled glitter (Stampendous) over it.
Some of my favorite quotes from "We Bought A Zoo":
Better known as RPK, the self-exiled editor of the Malaysia-Today news portal was quoted in an Umno-owned national daily as crediting Anwar’s huge support to widespread public perception of the opposition leader as an “alternative” to the ruling Barisan Nasional (BN).
veils – mostly in conjunction with widows and mourning
I realized I didn't actually want a guy with a backhoe to do it for me, even if I could afford it. One day it struck me that the process I was involved in was much like giving birth at home - it was MY work, my transformation. I was about halfway through the leveling process at that point; I was leveling the earth as it was leveling me.
On Valentine’s Day, we pause to show our love to our dearest life-partners, be they spouses or significant others or boyfriends and girlfriends. There’ll typically be an exchange of gifts, perhaps an intimate dinner spiced with snuggles and nuzzles and, at the end of the evening, with any luck, the dirtiest, most degrading sex acts you can imagine.
within minutes a middle aged woman enters the room and sets out various terms and conditions for the young man and his two companions. The young man is warned that he will be incarcerated for an indeterminate period and will only be allowed out of the facility when he is no longer a danger to the general public. His two companions are informed that during visiting hours they will be limited to 30 minutes only, and no longer. Thus ends day two.
and overall “things that just aren’t normal”
While this is a blog to showcase the great sides of Accra and Ghana, it's important to show the bad as well--just for balance, you understand;-)
Carys Bray lives in the North West seaside town of Southport with her husband and four children. She is a PhD student and associate tutor in creative writing at Edge Hill University. Her work has been published in a wide variety or magazines and anthologies, including New Fairy Tales where her story ‘The Ice Baby’ was published, and Mslexia which published her story ‘Just in Case,’ winner of the MA category of the Edge Hill Short Story Prize.
(Side note for current and prospective clients: there is far more to photography – good photography – than meets the eye. Please don’t believe that every LOW priced photographer out there is worth it. And don’t buy into the misconception that all you need is a nice camera; or that it costs nothing to be a photographer; and all we do is snap a few photos; or that boutique/personal photographers are overpriced…I can assure you, for the most part, they are not.
No you can't chance us being seen together.
2. Stir grated lime zest into batter.
No evidence has ever been presented to support that. To my mind, the dimensions of evil in that case were much broader and ultimately incomprehensible.
So, I took the kids to school and when I came home I put on an old radio show to listen to and lie down on the couch. I know if I'm truly as tired as I feel I'll fall asleep before the 30-minute show is over and I'll be out for a bit. If I'm just lazy, I won't be able to sleep and will get up at the end of the show.
Anyway the thing we can't get over is already this few days of demolition has caused arguments with our building company who were trying to claim they didn't know the weatherboard was there and wanted to charge us extra to remove it.
The Calvinist argues that if someone is saved, and if they fall away from grace, then, yes, they would be lost forever. However, the Father will never let that happen. The writer is speaking in a “manner” that is not necessarily a reality.
Will you turn to these verses in your Bible the next time you are tempted to focus solely on your problems? What are some of your favorite verses about joy?
Thankyou so much, Tracy, for suggesting and hosting and to this lovely group of women for making it such a good, good day. I think we're all a little sad that it's over. I suppose we all knew that getting together with like-minded people is a very good thing to do. I think we just need to do it more often.
I would not be comfortable singing about a state of affairs that I did not know was true. And yet, that is exactly what happens in churches and youth groups. Young people are brought up to sing about a story without first having any evidence that the story is true. Imagine what that does to a person – what are they thinking about the purpose of the singing? They don’t know these things are true, but they sing anyway! The church services almost never link what the Bible says to anything in the real world. Naturally, as soon as children hit the university, they fall away. Their questions about the problem of evil, the problem of suffering, the problem of world of religious pluralism, the hiddenness of God, justice of Hell, etc. were never answered.
So for my hop creation I chose to do a Scrapbook page about myself, I don't think we ever do enough about ourself and when we pass the creations on to our family the should have a little of us in there LOL!! after all you are the Author :)
So one day (more like a month and a half ago) she saw me eating a banana from the peel. Of course she likes to try/eat everything that Mommy has so she asked for a bite of the banana. I was a bit hesitant about it, because I was so sure she was going to spit it out. To my surprise, she didn't. She smiled and asked for more.
The Wind that Shakes the Barley
As a result, many writers--me included--simply allowed rights to their OOP books to sit with their publishers. This suited the publishers fine, since it could be very handy to still be holding rights to the OOP books of a suddenly-famous author. Dan Brown is one example of this--after The Da Vinci Code became a mega-success, his publisher rushed his OOP books back into print.
There are things I could do to rectify this. Mostly they involve ripping back or ripping out the middle section so the increases at the hips are positioned higher up. Or I could find someone taller that it might fit? With more curves so that the fabric has negative ease. No. “Strike three & you’re out!” I say. Now to bring myself to rip it… all… over… again… I find I’m all out of resolve to whip this WIPs butt.
A Communist theme is reflected in menu procurement as well. I believe there is only one in the whole building and we had to wait for the restaurant to finish with it first. When it came, I realized why our upstairs comrades may have taken so long with it. Incredibly dim lighting combined with a handwritten (in cursive) menu in fine ballpoint pin on grid paper takes a while to see clearly. From what I could decipher, various vodka based drinks are on offer.
*Arterial bleed from a patient's arm...bleeding all over the place. Looked like a murder scene.
Not to feed you incriminating information or anything, but the Man and I are hooked on the epic HBO series Game of Thrones. Every week we gather with a few friends who share our superior taste in television, and things get primal. We eat. We imbibe. We fume, hiss, cat-call, and shout at the screen. It’s exhausting.
At first my mighty hunters wanted to open an upstairs window and wait for the marauders. But since that let the air conditioning out and the heat, humidity and bugs in, I squashed that idea. So then my main hunter, Indiana Jones himself, bought a trap to use in catching these little garbage thieves.
A shaft of light to guide me home,
So, this also means the normal hours of the day change. Kids are shuffled around and classes are shorter. Not to mention, we all know kids who just took the test as tired from taking one of the most important tests of the school year. So your day for teaching new material is pretty much shot.
...The creation of a work of art - the growth of the crown of the tree - must of necessity, as a result of entering into the specific dimensions of pictorial art, be accompanied by distortion of the natural form, for, therein, is nature reborn."
No matter where you're at in the writing/plotting/editing/querying/throttling a blurb process, no matter how you're feeling about it, you're still doing it. (And yes, taking a break is still doing something in the writing process--you're recharging your creative juices!) You're writing a book and that is an incredible thing. Seriously, seriously incredible. You're starting from nothing and ending with a world, and characters, and a story you care about. Even on those days when you can only write ten words and you want to bang your head on your keyboard or throttle your characters--you're sticking with it.
But Indian Philosophy holds that gnyana (knowledge) is the way to moksha (salvation). For Indians ignorance is to be destroyed for Adam and Eve knowledge was to be avoided. So unless they were after knowledge that was expressly forbidden to them (why would it be so?), this point sticks out like a sore thumb.
The vet explained that us cats do not have the proper chemical make-up to process carbohydrates correctly, and essentially, that’s mostly what dry food is – all carbs. So we eat it, and our bodies store it, and we don’t know that we’re full because we don’t process it, so we keep eating it. Our bodies keep storing it and pretty soon, we’ve got a problem. When switched to a fully wet food diet, that better mimics what we would eat in the wild, we do much better.
“It all depends on what you think suitable attire is,” says 19-year-old music student Dean Millar from Co. Down. “Clothes are clothes as long as you’re covering yourself it should be fine. At the same time make an effort and get dressed.”
Just what is the boundary?
Bert blinked, all blue-eyed innocence and confusion. “It’s not?”
Today it was supposed to be rainy and gross. Instead, the sun has been shining, and we have been walking all over town. Shopping, looking at boats, eating, drinking, and shopping.
I admit it. I feel this niggling depression lurking in me. It’s something that doesn’t feel good, it feels really horrible. However, I’m not sure if it’s a feeling of depression or anxiety. Maybe I am just anxious about the things that are going on with me at the moment. I have only 8 days until I move to the rehabilitation program and I guess it’s only natural to feel anxiety. I’ve had 14 long months in hospital and making this move is scary. But I’m pretty sure there’s a niggling of depression. I think that it’s because of me coming out of the hospital and facing the real world again. I could forget about the real world whilst being in hospital. It hasn’t mattered that I have no friends or sense of direction in life. Amongst other things. A sense of self and all the rest of it. I’m quite scared about relapse and coming back to the hospital again. However, it does feel that I have turned the corner enough in order that I won’t end up wound back up in hospital. I really hope that is the case. For example, I haven’t self-harmed in about 8 months, neither have I had the desire to do so. I hope that I can keep this up. I’ve come a long way since wanting to commit suicide, to then wanting to and doing self harming.
If you could start over again,
I don’t know what the screenplay looked like before Chabon started his repairs, but Stanton is already planning two sequels. Burroughs wrote ten, but Disney wants to rake in $700 million first. That’s less than Spider-Man 2, but still a high bar for even an interplanetary superman to clear.
She takes me outside again and repeats the silly words. I comply. Back inside.
So that is my update....don't forget our competition...Mom has been REALLY enjoying this doodling thing (even though she ignores ME while she is doing it) and finds it very calming so she would love to do some for you too.
Here is some food for thought on your Thursday.
Tuesday: Menu tasting at the reception hall (yum!)
Luke Woollard is probably a person no one outside of Perth has heard of. He is 23 years old and the son to a MP (member of Parliament) and a cardiologist. When he was 19 he made a decision to skipper an uninsured boat after a day and night of drinking which would collide with a navigation pylon.
All sorts of stuff in there, lots of pics (some taken by me!) and info on the fairly packed programme he has prepared for 2011.
Not only do I want to say "Thanks" for making ME laugh - but more importantly - THANK YOU FOR MAKING MY SISTER LAUGH !!!
‘William, you knew this was going to happen.’
Who Do You Think You’re Fooling – Captain Beefheart & his Magic Band
Have you told your husband I LOVE YOU today? Cause I know we all forget often! ;)
About The Lacuna
Sensing, as a minister, should remember how exquisitely tuned Jesus' intuition was. He used it to discern any number of less-than-obvious realities and go straight to the heart of things. His remark to Nathanael -- "before Philip called you, when you were under the fig tree, I saw you" -- is one of dozens of instances of Jesus' intuition. It is a faculty to be developed and used, not one to be dismissed by leaving out important aspects of another's experience. Thus, Sensing's comments on what amounts to Jacobsen's "After Action Report" are disappointing at best.
Health is good, we must remind you
It's as much as I can do to finish work, make it home and make tea at the moment. I mean, that's probably an exaggeration, but still, energy levels are ebbing, and I'm waiting for those lighter nights. Can't wait for allotment weather.
Which is a project that I'm cheating on my other projects with. It's going well, as most things that have been bottled up for a long time do. I reckon I might as well share the first two words of WinterNovel here.
Troubled families, according to the UK government, are those where parents are out of work, children are not in school, and family members are involved in anti-social behaviour and crime. These problems are often long-standing and inter-generational—children whose parents have multiple problems are eight times more likely to be suspended or excluded from school than other children, and ten times more likely to be in trouble with the police. The 120,000 most troubled families in the UK cost society an estimated £9bn every year.
By Douglas E. Schoen
Michael N. Marcus—a noted prankster and man of sharp humour and wisdom—has dealt with all of this in his own inimitable way—by hitting back with a blog—chronicling his experience in all of this. If I know Michael, we can expect a book too!
A Brush of Darkness is Allison Pang‘s debut novel. It’s been blurbed by writers I admire like Seanan McGuire and Kelly Gay and so I was quite excited to get my hands on the book. I didn’t buy it right away, though, because I didn’t love the cover. The model has dead face and I found it a little off-putting. Plus the outfit makes her look super sexed up in a way I found unappealing. But I just couldn’t resist the idea of a saucy miniature unicorn and so I bought a copy the other day. And then devoured it.
someone who loved you
Tomato sauce, 3 tablespoons
Cyclops has stolen from him. He appeals to
CLAY: Can I help you?
LOTS of prints to choose from!!
One of the friends is one that I have known since high school. For a few years we were inseparable. Her parents were like a second set of parents to me. We grow apart our senior year….which sucks now but we were both immature about things and our friendship ended. I am sorry that it ended but I know that’s part of life.
4 C + 1/4 C flour
I don’t have much to say about this book unfortunately, other than it is a nice, simple, enjoyable read for cozy fans . . . and I flew through it on my iPad as I was sweating away on the elliptical! A great workout book!
The heart chakra corresponds with “polarity,” swinging back and forth between extremes with the idea being that one should equalize.
“I’m heading home. The answers are all in London” Keith replied as he turned to face the room again.
And there’s a lot to be said about the current attitude the club is radiating. So far they’ve had the benefit of having a team ahead of us to chase down. But now they’re ahead in the race for third and all alone. They need to maintain this intensity, be ready to overcome the bad luck, injustice and doubts that could lie in wait over the next nine matches.
By the time we meet the escorts at the gate, they have had a chance to rest a bit, the babies are clean and fed, and Sr. Ellen has tickets under control. Sr. Ellen is able to go on board with escorts to help get them settled. We say goodbye to the little cuties and wish them a happy life. Sometimes it is hard to part with them!
The labor and delivery part scares me as well. I'm so not looking forward to it. I have been having terrible nightmares about that too. My doctor is requiring that Hubby and I attend a birthing education class next weekend. They even show you the tools that they may use during labor. No thank you. The less I know the better.
Can this machine successfully impersonate a woman? Rotwang and Joh decide to test its ‘humanity’ by having it perform a burlesque show in an upscale nightclub. De Mille would have been proud of the pagan excess that ensues. Really, it’s the drooling male club-members whose humanity is being tested, and they pass, in the sense they prove themselves only human. Robot Maria incites the wealthy to riot from sheer sexual excitement. Its verisimilitude thus established, it then takes Maria’s place in the underground pulpit and preaches a sermon of anarchic rage, inciting desperate men to destroy, destroy, destroy the machines that enslave them.
Those with a smug moral superiority soon discover that they have a powerful weapon to force their beliefs on others, via yet another powerful inherent directive - the need of people to evade criticism and sustain social acceptance.
I hope you'll forgive the briefest interruption of our usual frivolity for a moment's genuine admiration. Coretta Scott King would have been 85 today, and it's a damn shame she's not. We need her now more than ever.
ok thats my input for what ever its worth
Do the heavy housekeeping before Thanksgiving week. Over loading yourself with chores is just stressful. Do what you can before hand and if you need to purchase some DO NOT ENTER police tape because you only time for half the house, do it. Just make sure that everyone is not confined to one small room of the house!
· Unlocked 3rd gen Intel Core processors feature top-of-the-line speed, especially when overclocking
I answered intelligently, and promptly until another part of my body wanted a piece of the action. My stomach! As the interview got more intense, my stomach started to twitch and turn for attention, and I tried so hard to control it, but it was not having any of that.
I've seen stories about mind-reading before, but never one so thoroughly consistent and chillingly believable. Kira Moore rocks. Her quest to find her place in the world and to save the people she loves had me on the edge of my seat. I highly recommend this book for readers age twelve and up.
IBU: 50
On the water
Year: 2006
Big Sky Brewing Company Ivan The Terrible
For our curry, the trick will be of course be, (a) use of oven-which to my knowledge is an unheard of technique in the making of a curry, and (b) use of tomato paste. Tomato paste is an Italian import, mostly southern Italian. The tomato is sun dried and then made into a paste. Calabrians have some phenomenal use of tomato paste. For those of you who may not know, Calabria is a part of southern Italy which has some of the best uses of tomato and pepper and eggplant. The sun is abundant and the soil is perfect for tomatoes, peppers and eggplants. Some other day we would talk about sun drenched southern Italy. But today we are talking of a spicy curry from India. That too, the only authentic curry that you will find in India. With possible regional variations, of course.
8) Offer valid on regularly priced products only.
Tomorrow we celebrate Mother's Day. Like in the UK we celebrate it on the second Sunday in May.
My heaven will have a meadow like this, but perhaps smelling less like pee.
Make sure you take advantage of the services offered by your bank to alert you to account information. It is rare to find a bank that does not send out emails or texts to alert of you of account events. These simple alerts can let you know about big potential problems, such as low balances and large withdrawals, protecting you from overdrafts and even fraud.
From the days of Marx onward, there were innumerable "splits" in the extreme Leftist movement but two of the most significant occurred around the time of the Bolshevik revolution --- when in Russia the Bolsheviks themselves split into Leninists and Trotskyites and when in Italy Mussolini left Italy's major Marxist party to found the "Fascists". So from its earliest days Leftism had a big split over the issue of nationalism. It split between the Internationalists (e.g. Trotskyists) and the nationalists (e.g. Fascists) with Lenin having a foot in both camps. So any idea that a nationalist cannot be a Leftist is pure fiction.
Jo Mills, director of planning and new communities, said the parish council had complained there were 408 caravans north of the A14, and only 58 to the south.
When signs of the apocalypse begin following a wandering stranger, the Vatican sends a priest, Father Lucas, to investigate. In n interesting twist, he is a skeptic that end time prophecy is being fulfilled, but the pregnant Abby, played by Moore, believes differently. Usually in these kind of movies, the priest is a rogue true believer going against the skepticism of his superiors. that is an original twist.
Unfortunately, life keeps moving us faster than we ever want. Years actually do fly. I’ve found feathers in my doorway on cold mornings. They certainly weren’t left by angels or pigeons or a showgirl. What other options could there be? The drag queen in my building is allergic.
* The best thing a father can do for his children is love their mother. Anonymous
PS: Link day. Help yourself if you are so inclined. Post as many as you want, but only one per comment or the spam dragon will eat you up and I’ll never even know.
Have you ever felt like Rip Van Winkle, suddenly waking up and realizing that changes have taken place while you were sleeping or simply not focusing on a particular thing—perhaps a thing that you grew up with, something ineffably lovely—and now that “something” has vanished?
I’ll just pick my top five.
and paralyzed, on
Few sushi restaurants in Bergen County can approach the quality level of Wild Nigiri. In the last few years the restaurant has gone to a very limited, focused menu with emphasis on very fresh ingredients and keeping the quality level high.
1 spending
-Do say, "I am so sorry." That's enough. You don't need to be eloquent. Say it and mean it and it will matter.
I'm feeling a little better about everything today though. I know that none of this is Jim's fault and we're both going to have to find a way to adjust to this crazy setup the best we can. It's just really hard. I also find that when I'm upset like that my pregnancy hormones go crazy and I start getting upset about EVERYTHING. My sweet friend Carrie reminded me though that it's okay to feel the way I do sometimes. Considering the circumstances, I'm allowed a few bad days. I'm really grateful for the reminder. :) Jim also gave me a bit of perspective this morning. He got up super early so he could come visit me (isn't he the best!) and he brought a book to read to the girls:
All this might, just might, have been avoided if DeSean Jackon had gone to a special teams practice on Saturday. That was the reason he was declared inactive. However, if anything Philadelphia fans have learned over the years, it is this: Practice? It's no big deal. After all, it's not a game.
Rating: 3.5/5
This was a wonderful meal! I just loved dipping the sandwiches into the flavorful broth. This was definitely an easy winner for us!
Today, I want to wish a very happy birthday to the father of my children.
About 9 months or so before my gastric bypass surgery, I was told to begin a 6 month medically supervised weight loss plan and that I would have to stick to it and lose weight to qualify for surgery. I made up my mind to do it and I did. My plan was 1400 calories per day. It was lower carb as I was diabetic at the time and it was high protein because I knew that protein would be important after surgery. I lost about 30 pounds or so by the time my surgery came around. After surgery, I was given a plan by a registered nutritionist. It consisted of 600 calories including 60 to 80 grams of protein, less than 30 grams of fat, and a daily total of 100 gram of carbohydrates. However, I was never to exceed 30 grams of carbs at one sitting. I was allowed 3 meals and 1 snack a day, besides one protein shake. This is what worked for me. When I started playing with the plan, I got in trouble. When my psych meds were increased, I got into even more trouble. Playing with carbs for me is like playing with fire. I can see that after the way things have been going the last couple of months. I don't do well with complete restriction, but one bite too much starts the cravings for more.
We ran against the current to an old soundtrack.
Because your business is profitable, you decide to make a commitment towards growth and purchase larger quantities of supplies for bulk discounts. You have an inner sense of accomplishment from putting your art out into the world.
During the execution of the study, 5,000 tourists were interviewed at information centers and asked about their expectations to the city they were visiting. Once they had returned to their home countries, they filled out a questionnaire about their experience, including cleanliness. The tourists gave each city points on a scale of 0 to 100.
First place to start is why do we suffer stuff like sickness and disease? The simple answer is easy; sin. When God created Adam and Eve He intended for them to live forever. He told them that if they disobeyed that it would bring on death, and in that, pain and suffering. As we all know, they disobeyed and God kept His word. From that time on, pain and suffering were a part of our lives. As humanity reproduced, the sin nature is passed from generation to generation and therefore, we have and always will have pain and suffering.
I am currently a stay at home mom, in a small town in Western Wisconsin, and as much as my plans and dreams are to start my own organizing business some day in the future, being home with my tiny tots is number one to this gal. I have two in school full time and my baby is quickly going from finger foods to drivers permit, so I am doing what I can to ensure not a single great moment is missed.
So next time you’re perusing the aisles at Duane Reade looking to satisfy your cravings without packing on the pounds keep these in mind. Opt for these 5 healthier alternatives to get you through your day. MaxWell Medical wants you to use these simple swaps for BETTER HEALTH!
Lost has always been about redemption, righting the wrongs from the past. The castaways have been given that opportunity in the form of traveling back in time, approximately 20-25 years, to fix what was broken. It doesn’t mean that they will succeed, but they were given another chance at life.
Biscuits - cookies.
The Knicks fans were hoping that the trade for Carmelo Anthony would solve their decade of troubles, but it has not been as smooth sailing as they hoped. Part of the reason of their troubles is due to them trading half their team away including two forwards in Danilo Gallinari and Wilson Chandler who have the ability to score, yet they know their role on the team and do not always demand the ball. Also, the Knicks gave up three big men in Eddie Curry, Anthony Randolph, and Timothy Mazgov who would ease the minutes of Amare Stoudemire, but in my mind, the most important player they gave up is Raymond Felton. Felton is a explosive point guard who fit into the D’Antoni offense perfectly and can set up fast breaks with his team-hi of steals.
Many of you already know this, but for those of you who do not here is why you might want to be able to do this, and how you can: First of all, if you live in an area that is prone to power outages like we have here in Florida, especially during the hurricane season, it would be truly great to have an alternative source of weather and world information; something better than an ordinary “Weather Radio.” Of course battery-operated television sets are on the market, but a set with a decent sized viewing screen is rather expensive, and even they won’t work in most locations without a good antenna system (cable, satellite, or dish). And what if you have to evacuate? Will the battery operated TV work in your car, RV, or shelter?
So, be on the lookout for a "Gadgets " section with an "Advertise products" choice when writing your posts. If it is there, then select an ad and include it in your article!
The simplest way to incorporate fresh corn – boiled or grilled – into everyday fare is to add it to your salads. Bean salads, pasta salads, potato salads…even a tossed green salad. However, I particularly like to add corn to my crabmeat salad. Corn and crab are made for each other. Just take fresh lump crabmeat, corn, onion, celery, mayonnaise and a bit of hot sauce (to balance out the sweetness), gently combine and serve on a hot dog bun. Simple, but really satisfying. Even my crab cakes are set on a sauce of corn, which is basically home-made creamed corn that has been pureed and spiked with a kick of hot sauce. Again, simple but incredibly delicious.
For example: “Mitchell is a pretty cool guy. Eh writes articles and doesn’t afraid of anything.”
History shows that higher taxes are compatible with economic growth and job creation: job creation and GDP growth were significantly stronger following the Clinton tax increases than following the Bush tax cuts. Further, the Congressional Budget office (CBO) concludes that letting the Bush-era tax cuts expire on schedule would strengthen long-term economic growth, on balance, if policymakers used the revenue saved to reduce deficits. In other words, any negative impact on economic growth from increasing taxes on high-income people would be more than offset by the positive effects of using the resulting revenue gain to reduce the budget deficit. Tax increases can also be used to fund, or to forestall cuts in, productive public investments in areas that support growth such as public education, basic research, and infrastructure.
The most obvious influence on Saturn is Jupiter, who aspects Saturn in Aries because he is in the opposite sign, Libra. Jupiter is a benefic. No other planets directly influence Saturn. So we have another positive indication for the first house of this chart because a benefic and no malefics influence the lord of the first house.
ian running errands with me every saturday morning lately. i have started to really look forward to that time with him. he's at that magical age of 15 where his social life is almost- just there- starting to take over, but not. quite. yet- so we still have him as our boy for a little longer. he is such good company, you know how some people are just reliably good company? i can't say that about myself, but ian, yes.
At only 3 percent ABV, Block 15's Berliner Weisse showed that beer doesn't have to be strong to be flavorful.
We'd have to ask, though, whether either of these options are more profitable than advertising. After all, Western Union, who doesn't have any stake in most of these bodegas (none of the ones pictured above actually offer any Western Union services on site), has been putting up the same signs, and not just in NYC--I saw two in Chicago during a November visit. If Western Union is employing the tactics discussed above, it isn't to protect any investment, merely to keep shoppers walking past their signs. I highly doubt that increased traffic from either the "thank you" effect or the "branding" effect would be enough to make it worth their while to forgo a month's worth of ad revenues.
that was all i got ?!??!
Although, Émilie translated literary works and wrote Biblical Commentary on Genesis and the New Testament, there are two major works for which Émilie du Châtelet is best known. One is Institution de physique, “Lessons in Physics.” Originally intended as a text for her son, it was her assessment of the latest ideas in science and mathematics. In it she attempted to reconcile and explain the works of the major thinkers of her time, such people as Newton, Leibniz, etc. These were concepts that few people could really grasp as the time.
And this was where we took the photos... What a beautiful garden!
It doesn’t take a lot to get European stocks rising these days. Thanks to all that QE and Zirp, large concerns and their bankers can buy their own shares if necessary. But 0.1% in one country about to topple over a cliff is the best bippy so far in terms of a crazy rationale for confidence. I hear there’s a donkey auction on Spetse tomorrow. Stand by for a bull market on the main Greek bourses of they sell two hind legs more than expected.
So, that was my $12.95 3 Course Italian Dinner experience. Is your mouth watering? The special is running through March 18th so there's still plenty of time to try it! Are you ready to enter a special giveaway?
So it appears that the old to-do list isn't getting any shorter and it actually keeps getting longer. Needless to say, blogging is lost somewhere on that list and I'm just not finding the time to keep up with it as much. I'm not giving up on it though. Things will start to fall into place and I'll have some more time on my hands... eventually.
And I thought of my daughter. And my son. And my youngest daughter.
(It's always reassuring when the person who is scheduled to watch your children doesn't know what day it is.)
Gosh, I look pregnant in this picture! Well I'm NOT!
Yet, when I am finally about to meet up with a guy, she freaks out.
In the Commons in December 1958 Labour’s Frank Tomney, remarked on elected representatives ignoring their constituents. “We have been sent here by the electorate to give expression to issues which concern them.” Fellow Notting Hill MP George Rogers (L) told the Daily Sketch of 2/9/58,” Overcrowding has fostered vice, drugs, prostitution and the use of knives.” James Harrison (L) from Nottingham also supported controls. Mr Tomney was a practical man of humble origins and understood his people, "I have come directly from the benches of a factory to the benches of the Commons". Tomney's defence of his young constituents in the House of Commons debate on the 1958 Notting Hill Race Battles, who were inaccurately represented by their lawyers, stitched up by the police and given excessive sentences by evil Judge Salmon. This was the most noble and heroic speech in the history of the House of Commons.
ROASTED CHERRY TOMATO PASTA WITH SPINACH
4) Season with salt, black pepper and some herbs/spices.
you can’t even remember why you picked him up
Oh gosh, the last TLT of the year :(
As Christians, God, through His grace, accepts us because we belong to His precious Son. We don't deserve His acceptance or His love that He lavishes on us but He graciously offers it to us.
Ten months separate H and I in age and do you know what is so poetic? Ten months now separate the age between our daughters. And we are both God Mothers to each others children.
smoke a puff or two
“April brings the primrose sweet, scatters daisies at our feet” Well, not so much here in New England, although it must have been so in the Lake District of “Old” England where Sara Coleridge was born and raised. Here, the ‘April White’ Rhododendron is blooming in a very timely manner, along with Pieris, Hazels, and an early flowering Cherry, ‘Snow Fountains’.
Some folks that he went to QC with remember his as a boy liking religious knowledge. Some also recall him living with a grandmother. These things may seem insignificant but unless some folks have a certain inner strength, certain fortitude and a hunger to grow wiser, the incidence of coming into contact with such persons becomes significantly greater especially when their political leadership lacks teeth. I almost said is locked into to skullduggery but I would reserve further comments until another time. Greene should just go.
I took my inspiration from the large letters and the colours but switched it up my using a plain black DL card, cutting strips of cards in the same colours as the inspiration cards die cut letter but stamping onto them with a large alphabet stamp set. I then heat embossed the "birthday" in white down the side rather than putting it into one of the letters. I like how it turned out and think it would be useful design for masculine cards.
And here we are with my opening shot in which I planned to tell you how we all dragged ourselves out of bed early on a Saturday morning to march into battle at Jack's first soccer game. But thanks to Blogger's updates and my laziness, this is now the end so I'll just have to say that I hope I can remember to upload the photos correctly next time despite years of Blogger brainwashing me to do things counter intuitively. Pregnancy brain is a wee bit frazzled these days.
The type C collector is someone who collects on a whim (for lack of a better phrase). This type of person may decide to purchase a card because "it looks cool" or maybe "it's a good player". This person might have three, four, or even forty mini-collections that he or she may slowly add to whenever the mood strike. Typically, a Type C collector doesn't actively look for cards from any particular collection but rather he or she wants something that can "be used" by any one of the aforementioned collections (or even a brand new collection)! This type of person is probably the easiest to trade with because they are willing to take cards that fit such broad categories...but only if you are willing to accept equally broad categories worth of cards in return!
I said one week, feed for the cow, one week, the children's flour.
At the time of Gregory's edict in 1582, the vernal equinox had moved backward in the calendar, until it was occurring on about 11 March, 10 days earlier. That means that Christmas would have been drifted all around, too.
7% 1 0 Rahr Flaked Corn (Maize) 40 1
Another thing I've been doing is working on the online auction that Arthritis Introspective is having in November of this year. We are having the auction to raise funds for our annual Gathering that will take place here in Houston. Probably in March of 2012, dates to be confirmed soon! The Gathering is a wonderful event. I've met so many great people with arthritis that inspire me, are so uplifting, and are so welcoming. Great personalities that have a sense of humor too. I recommend anyone that has arthritis to try and attend the next Gathering! You won't regret it. It's changed my life for the better. So, I've been working on writing letters, sending emails, brainstorming on ideas of which companies to contact. So far, I'm enjoying it! It's cool to be doing something important and that I'm capable of doing on my own time, when I'm feeling well. I've been working with Scott from Arizona on this project. He's great as he's done this before and has given me a lot of advice and information. Thanks Scott!
If a teacher really wants to get creative, he or she can add more of an interdisciplinary touch by collaborating with a music teacher to talk about the role of a drum major, and particularly the role of drum majors in the marching bands of Historically Black Colleges and Universities.
Created by the learning experts at Scholastic, Scholastic Storia is the FREE eReading App designed to help kids learn and love to read in a fun and interactive way. Scholastic Storia comes with 5 FREE eBooks, and introduces a growing collection of children’s digital picture, chapter, and interactive books. Download the Scholastic Storia App to access age-appropriate eBooks for children ages 3 to 14. Scholastic Storia allows parents to set up individual bookshelves for each of their children, purchase new eBooks for their children to read, and track a child’s progress through each eBook. Children can customize their bookshelves and use a variety of features that help them read in an independent and engaged way. COMES WITH 5 FREE eBOOKS Download Scholastic Storia and instantly start a child reading! Explore all the features that the App has to offer.
One by one Mynah watched them suffer and die. And as each one passed away, she took in their children, her newly orphaned grandchildren into her little cement home with two rooms.
Ernie Isley walked in front of Charleton at that exact moment he yelled and stopped. He stared at him briefly, and then said – “cut’em a break man, it’s harder than it looks up there.” Manny was on his fourth Heineken at that point and quickly spat – “If you’ve gonna play a cover – give it a fooking kick, or leave it alone.” Ernie just laughed, “You kill me man, you don’t even have the balls to be up there, hidin’ behind that green beer.”
“To have my bossy sister and bratty brother descend upon my humble home for an entire season?” he deadpanned.
I am dyed-in-the-wool RED: the colour blue was banned from our house when I was a kid. But I’d rather City won the Premiership (just this once) than have the English Fanny Adams appoint yet another deadbeat, obedient England manager.
How to Stop Sweaty Armpits and Palms – 5 Tips to Reduce Excessive Sweating
In Thy wounds I fain would hide,
This season’s Pasta Master cooking class is on Wednesday 2nd May but HURRY spaces are limited.
So here is my question then, Is it wrong to call me a racist when this is what they do? This is the reason I don’t trust them, this is the reason I don’t want to be associated with them and this is the reason why I don’t want to share this country with them….
I think the end will come like the boyfriend I'm told will appear when I'm not looking for him. I know this is a spurious comparison and probably in bad taste, but Mom's departure is on her mind and everybody who attends to her. I'm glad severe is part of persevere because no one is going gently into this good night. Even though she says she is ready to go, I see her raging against the dying of the light.
It looks like McLaren have opened up a slot in the back of the rear wing, this is visible as a blackline above the normal slot between the wing and flap. This slot is fed with air from the inlet and routed inside the shark fin and rear wing flap. The high pressure air exits through the slot and effectively makes the two element rear wing into a three element device. This allows the rear wing to angled more steeply without fear of stalling, thus creating more downforce.
This is the second post in our series spotlighting the the most manic, crazy James Brown sides out there, the ones that sacrifice either traditional rhythm and blues structures OR the repetitive patterns that became funk for sheer rhythmic excitement and agitation. We're calling them James Brown's Rock and Roll for now, but I can't shake the feeling that's not quite right.
Garlic (as many as you want – full heads though)
Those questions were answered by lunchtime: Yes, yes and yes.
Breillat cowrote the story with Cédric Anger and director Xavier Beauvois, in which Benoît Magimel plays Matthieu, a factory worker who works with his father in Normandy, until his father is fired for smoking on the job. While Matthieu fights to get his job back for him, his father dies in a car crash. But Matthieu thinks it was a suicide and decides to exact revenge on his boss by having an affair with his wife (Nathalie Baye).
What?! When? What?! How?!
Wow, it has been AGES since my last post - and now that I am on spring break I have finally had a chance to breathe and get back into the swing of things. We had an interesting PD day before we left for break, as my school is changing their strategic plan and wanted to get some input from the staff as to the direction the school should be headed (whether or not our input is valued... we shall see!) There was a question they asked that got me thinking - "What will education look like in the future, 20-30 years down the road?".
2. If your life were made into a movie, who would you cast as yourself? This is a really tough one for me...and although she looks NOTHING like me (the only celebrities I've been told I look like are Idina Menzel and Jennifer Connelly) is Emma Stone. She's funny and quirky and can play a nerd.
Elizabeth's hecklers may have a point about creativity and suffering being ultimately linked. Alcoholism and addiction seem synonymous with success, and the fear of never living up to the last work of art.
2. Don’t take anything personally.
With his gifted hands, he’s helping to develop and contribute to Crown Heights history. Frank is now retired and is touring the world. His journey is never ending, but in the end Crown Heights is “Home” for him.
You might be thinking that, more than adding emotional complexity and balancing the directions of your anger, that such a car crash would put you straight over the edge. Well, to mitigate this eventuality, I would suggest that you do, indeed, have a child with you during this small crash. You will have to maintain a sense of calm in order to keep her from getting too upset. And then, afterwards, when you've finally caught up with your husband and son who are waiting for you at the fish and chips place, your daughter, as you're walking up to the restaurant might take your hand and say, "Mama, if you need money to pay for the crash, I can give you a dollar." And you will smile and say, "Thank you, Sweetie. That is very nice of you."
Psalm 137:8-9 O daughter of Babylon, who art to be destroyed; happy shall he be, that rewardeth thee as thou hast served us. Happy shall he be, that taketh and dasheth thy little ones against the stones.
“He puts so much into it, it’s not a job for him, it’s a lifestyle,” Hopkins said.
I had been trying to write a new weird tale for Horror for the Holidays, an anthology being edited by Scott David Aniolowski for Miskatonic River Press. But writing has been next to impossible since moving my laptop upstairs, to the dining room, so that I can keep a closer look on me mum, who is becoming more and more challenging to watch over. And so I gave up on writing the new Sesqua Valley story I was working on, a tale of Rosh Chodesh in which Shub-Niggurath is worshiped as part of the Shekinah. Sadly, I inform'd Scott that I simply couldn't write. He then ask'd if I cou'd perhaps write a wee sonnet sequence concerning Jewish holidays for the book, & I've had the ache to return to poetry of late, so I said I'd try that. I wanted one of the sonnets to concern the minor holiday, Rosh Chodesh, the festival of the New Moon. Dwelling on ye moon always makes me think of Oscar Wilde, because the moon is so often invoked in Wilde's poetry, in Salome and others -- and there is that wonderfully irreverent illustration by Aubrey Beardsley, "The Woman in the Moon." Thinking of Wilde led me to scan his poetry for mentions of Luna, and this led me to YouTube, so as to listen to readings of Wilde's poetry. Among the Wilde videos were some shewing visitors to Wilde's tomb ---
- Grupo Fantasma (Latin Horn section that'll have you dancing
A HUGE thank you to Scor-Pal for providing Scor-Buddies to the Skipping Stones Design Team! We LOVE THEM!!!!
In Vancouver, it is by no means a Slurpee Day.
Culture – How many excellent thinkers have pointed out that political reform is useless until we produce a cultured populace (p. 52).
Amit Bansal answers, I can understand your situation, however force fit is a normal process during appraisal process. You may want to assess your management’s perspective to do this objectively and complete justice towards each member of your team.
Third Place: A reading & Q&A in a NYC Theater valued at $525
Here's a great tree; I'll pause a while;
So because of my African background, I am seldom moved at the sight of death, unless it’s accidental, or it affects someone close to me. (Death which strikes at strangers, of course, is mostly ignored.) Of my circle of about eighteen or so friends with whom I grew up, and whom I would consider "close", only about ten survive today--and not one of the survivors is over the age of fifty. Two friends died from stepping on landmines while on Army duty in Namibia. Three died in horrific car accidents (and lest one thinks that this is not confined to Africa, one was caused by a kudu flying through a windshield and impaling the guy through the chest with its hoof--not your everyday traffic accident in, say, Florida). One was bitten by a snake, and died from heart failure. Another also died of heart failure, but he was a hopeless drunkard. Two were shot by muggers. The last went out on his surfboard one day and was never seen again (did I mention that sharks are plentiful off the African coasts and in the major rivers?). My situation is not uncommon in South Africa--and north of the Limpopo River (the border with Zimbabwe), I suspect that others would show worse statistics.
“One Day,” is more than just a song—it’s a musical invitation to rest in the hope of an eternal life void of trials, pain or sorrow. “It’s about taking on the Lord’s perspective, from Heaven,” adds Gaines, “instead of resting in our own understanding.”
There in a bed, covered up to the chin by a heavy blanket of death-white, lay a girl with a dried tear on her cheek.
I got a call on Friday from R&D’s HR rep. They want their stuff back. (Big surprise, eh?) So I am to come in tomorrow morning to “exchange” things: company property for personal property. The only joy I take in this is that our group manager is the one who has to sift through all my boxes and try to identify what is mine. Ha! That should take him a while. I took most of my stuff when I left. Since I am notorious for leaving piles of paper all over my desk, he ought to be having fun right about now. Of course, I wonder if this means I will get back my 15 bottles of half-drunk water. Ha! Ha! Ha!
“It’s very hypocritical because they themselves…own colours. I just don’t understand how you can say well, you cannot own a specific colour on a specific place when you yourself own different colours.
All because of the immodesty of Salma Hayek.
Victory's Ron Barchet got a wild bee in his bonnet about terroir once Victory got to the size where they could start working directly with hop growers in Germany. That was in 2007. Before then, they'd used a broker, like most small brewers; going to Germany isn't cheap, dealing with individual farmers adds time to the process. But as Ron told us at Victory's Terroir des Tettnangs event late last month, there's no middleman, and you get a direct connection to the hop growers. They went directly to Tettnang (you can see Tettnang below, at the center of the map, right near Lake Constance in Baden-Wurttemburg, south of Stuttgart.
Similarly, many of us might have been through addiction to Facebook and Twitter. Despite the reality that that does no good to us, we just cannot stop ourselves. Abstaining for few days from the social media leaves many of us with withdrawal syndrome. Recently, students and workers have been reported to have low performance due to the increasing addiction which is not a good news for any of us.
The bright sunshine of yesterday has been replaced with dreary rain clouds today. Recipe for a perfect day of cuddling up skin to skin under the blankets with a certain little miss.
Google doesn’t pay taxes in Turkey and so the government has internally blocked some of Google’s ISPs. This means at the moment, my friends and readers in Turkey are unable to access my blog. I am looking to move over the site to another provider but it might take a bit of time and research. Hopefully this will be resolved soon. Please let me know if you have any suggestions.
With an unprecedented amount of talent-based reality shows hitting the small screen these days, it’s Stern’s straightforward style that might ultimately keep viewers turning in. “That’s what a show like this needs. Not somebody that’s going to be pressured like, ‘Oh, I’m gonna vote him in because I feel sorry for him.’ I don’t want somebody voted in favor of because they might be old or something, or it’s a little kid. Hey, if you’re not talented, get off the stage!”
I arrived back in Manhattan much rested and ready for adventure. We listened to jazz music in Harlem (after spending over an hour extra on the subway because we were talking so much we missed 3 different stops)
LARKLIGHT
Up against the wall, as if through a window
Other than when she made cheesecake and baklava, I never saw her use a recipe. She left behind no cookbooks, no recipe box, no trace of the unadorned but nourishing meals she cooked over the years.
My predilection to this genre started on a long long flight to India. I was in a hurry to board the flight and grabbed the first book I laid my eyes on (bookstore being a Twilight storage house helped). I couldn’t keep my eyes off it for the entire flight and was done before stepping on to the next continent. Craving to get hold of the sequel. I ended up finishing all the four books before reaching back to Boston.
You know--I don't really remember much about the chili. It was good as I recall, but I must not have been blown away by it. Now I know the place was actually called "Fred and Red's" but Red's is easier to remember. Maybe one day I'll have to go back and give the chili another try. Apparently the place is still in business.
Very much in need of a photographic artist to teach in K-12 setting
As always, the Zionists make extraordinary assertions about the Israeli Jews' unsurpassable morality, only to shout "double standards" when one wants to look into the validity of those claims.
John (The penguin!) Bingham
Back inside, she feeds me. Then she talks to him.
I'm not making a New Year's resolution to stop whingeing, because it's quite fun, but I am resolving to stop putting myself into a situation where I feel the need to whinge... quite so often.
Marvin Berry: "I hurt my hand. The dance is over unless you can find another guy to play bass."
Important Points of Reference (for astrologers):
paras tasmāt tu bhāvo ’nyo
There is a sampling of some of the tasty things I have made the past couple of weeks. I linked each recipe back to the website where I found it. So go look them up and get to cooking!
At my present counseling position, I don't typically have to do this a lot. At an Early College students are generally a little more focused on bigger things that on tearing each other down.
He laughed and said that my timing was perfect "Here, take that big red bastard--he's good under saddle and he's kicking the place down"
It was night in a world that had ended in a nuclear apocalypse and we’d made it across wastelands to one of the last outposts where all the rebels, nomads, pirates and smugglers stop on their way to parts unknown. Standing sentry was a giant horse made of wood. In a surprising show of civility, the Trojan tree house horse had made it the entire summer without being torn apart by any of the revelers. It had been damaged once, but they got together and fixed it. There were probably open fires in oil drums or at least some torches and over a hundred of people massed. It was incredibly laid-back though because the squat is also just a place where you can go for a drink and sit outside biergarten style. We purchased our drinks and sat at one of the long wooden tables around the side of the fortress, first walking through a cobblestone passageway once traversed by horses and stable hands. In the sleeping medieval village above, the giant cuckoo clock in the towne centre rang a few soft midnight gongs.
grass and listen to the trees.
Now it’s time to pay the bill, and not eat so much fooooood!
But, because the Posse is such a generous scholarship and could have really helped our family, I insisted that we go to Middlebury for a visit. First, I called the Posse Foundation and explained our situation to them. They were very receptive and honest. We were told that we had to make the choice by Friday. The catch is that if Elsa accepted the offer, she would be competing with 21 other students for 10 or 11 spots at Middlebury. It wasn't a sure bet at all. But, had we known of the timeline of deadlines in advance, we could have applied to her dream school EDII and accepted the Posse in the interim. If we accepted Posse and she got it, and she was selected by Middlebury from the 21 applicants, we would have had to send her. We would have been committed. So, we needed to see the school first.
by years of use and abuse
Shall I add more salt to the wound of information? This teacher is married to a farrier. I have heard his name, it sounds familiar but that's all. She also claims to have several other horses at home, somewhere around 25-30 head from what I understand.
...okay I just got back from running "The Nob" or Nob's Hill. That is NOT to be effed with. Well I'm off to check out a little bit of the Giants Parade (may as well watch someone enjoy winning), and then I'm onward to do some beering somewhere in around the Golden Gate Park.
The first Presocratics came from Miletus, an ancient city in the greater region of Ionia, which is now the Western coast of Turkey. Thales, who is thought to have been born in 625 b.c.e., is the earliest known Presocratic philosopher, and as such, is the first Western philosopher. The ideas of Thales probably sounded as bizarre in Seventh Century Ionia as they do now. He believed that water is the basic stuff of the universe, and that the earth floats on water. He believed that the soul produces motion, and that since magnets move iron, then magnets must have a soul. He is also said to have predicted a solar eclipse in 585 b.c.e. While this is an extremely brief summary and oversimplification of what Thales believed, it is also basically all we know of Thales ideas. However absurd they might seem upon initial reflection, they represent the earliest ideas about the physical properties of the cosmos without taking ancient Greek mythology and theology into account as explanations of natural phenomena.
He is nothing short of a miracle.
The reordering of the legal branch takes other forms. As is regularly discussed in this space, the process of selecting federal judges is increasingly subject to ideological litmus tests, which these days seem to doom the chances of a mainstream Republican to achieve appointment to the bench (other than as a courtesy appointment in a Democratic administration). As the Boston Globe has reported, the Department of Justice itself has witnessed an increasing process of politicization of hiring, affecting the Civil Rights Division, the Office of Legal Counsel, Office of Legal Policy, and other politically sensitive sections. Under the Bush Administration, even the Criminal Division has developed into a political flash point through its tight connections with the torture issue - much of which has not - yet - been aired in the press. There seems little doubt that the appointment of Alice Fisher to head this division occurred as a result of her close personal connection with torture and torture impunity issues, for instance.
I colored the penguin with Copic Markers and added glitter to his hat for alittle bling. I cut it out with Circle Nestibilities and popped it up with dimensionals. My card base is Concord Crush and layered that with a piece of white that was run thru my Cuttlebug with the Swiss Dots EF. I used Wisteria Wonder Ribbon and added some Silver Beads and called it done!
I had at times thought that it would never happen. I had been ready to give up along the way. Especially during the break that lasted 10 years , when I didn’t study at all. Yet, deep down inside I did want to finish. I didn’t want all the work to be in vain.
David Casey was born on March 19, 1976, and graduated from RACE, Ireland’s apprentice school. He had spells with Tony Redmond and Michael Hourigan before joining Willie Mullins, who provided him with his first winner at Tramore in January, 1995. The following year he won the Galway Hurdle for Mullins on Mystical City. In the 1999/2000 season, he took over from Jamie Osborne as stable jockey to Lambourn trainer Oliver Sherwood, but the pair parted company in December, 2000, after Casey, who lived in Tony McCoy’s house, was said to be repeatedly late for work. He turned freelance and returned to Ireland. He tasted Aintree triumph in 2000 when he won the John Smith’s Maghull Novices’ Chase aboard Cenkos. Other big race wins include the 2001
Personification: Patience I am hopeful that I can display the fruit of patience in my life today and everyday that God would have me wait to see my Dad except the truth of the Gospel in his own time. Patience is a virtue that I don’t focus on enough, but I know that God is still building it up in me and I can display it with the grace that comes from Him.
People banging on my door at 11 pm tend to freak me out, but they did...
III. sponge-stick (more on that in a moment)
At least - I think it does. What does it mean to you?
DP's: Chatterbox Light Parlor Stripe; DCWV Nana's Nursery Baby Boy paper pad; Provo Craft Super Slab 10 paper pad
Still been listening to Josh Nelson Project and really finding peace in the lyrics and am trying to focus on that during my times of frustration. I could not find the lyrics online to the song “Seven” by him, so I listened to it and typed them up. Here are the lyrics to that song:
Tom Cruise
(Old as he was, his gray eyes yet shone out in battle like stars,)
Now, I had a lovely time on my honeymoon, don't get me wrong. But holy shit, if the good Lord wasn't punishing us for some unknown sin, I just have the worst luck in the fucking universe.
Jesse: I’m sorry. I don’t know, I’m…I…I should…I…I shouldn’t have.
There is one issue that keeps Cherish from being an unqualified home run: The mix and mastering job are brickwalled to the extreme, squashing all the production detail and rendering this 40-minute LP tiring to listen to as a whole. Considering how much care went into the songwriting and overall conception, we have to assume that Cold Cave have their reasons for wanting the album to sound like this.
4th row: Knit.
My accommodations were the entire lower level of the house and included a kitchen, and a living room. There was also a 5‐shelf cabinet filled with books as varied in subject as items in a flea market. As I was taking it all in I thought these were the best accommodations I’ve ever had in connection with an auditing cycle. I was happy to be there.
Weekdays I’m a SAHM and weekends I work night shift at the local hospital.
Psalm 48: 10 continues with: Like your name, O God, your praise reaches to the ends of the earth; your right hand is filled with righteousness.
It’s all a bit… rude. Running that offense with players I don’t even know the name of, and I live for this shit. I don’t even know where Darron Thomas prepped. I can tell what quarter it is by the Rorschach blots at Matt Barkley’s armpits because I’ve studied, and watching Oregon was new. New is unpleasant and foul and always disconcerting in college football. New usually means you’re stuck in the stands as some other team storms the field. New means we are old, and we are. And we were direct snapping to Marc Tyler half the game.
I know that Josh got spotted at school this week for his "fantastic descriptive writing" and that makes me a very proud mama!
I loved Julia Roberts' mini in a sea of long column gowns. George Clooney looked slightly embarrassed for his girlfriend. It's like he presents the women he's dating to the press, to the world, and lets everyone else decide whether or not she's right for him. Of course she can never be right, b/c in photos with his mother, its clear who's still the number one women in his life.
It’s a fear that causes me to stop all rational thought and panic. It’s a fear that I speak about only in hushed whispers. It’s a fear that makes me feel like I have some deep-seeded emotions that I haven’t yet discovered.
I don't really remember those times. I remember bits and pieces of life before, say, 7 years old, but not very many things. I remember bugging the crap out of my Mom to let me open a birthday present before my Dad got home from work. I must have driven her crazy, because I remember her letting me open a pair of musical spoons. Do you remember those? They were two spoons with the rounded sides facing each other, and the handles were cemented into a piece of plastic. You would hold them in one hand, slap them against your knee while holding your other hand above them. They would slap between your hand and your leg and make magical noise.
That is a conflation of a reactionary with a progressive cause. It is reactionary when it blames foreigners for loss of control over the economy, land, jobs, incomes etc and looks to ‘national’ ownership as salvation. It is progressive when it blames foreign imperialism of all nations, and its agents in NZ, the NACTs, the banksters and the vulture capitalists, who as an international ruling CLASS, conspire to increase their
I'm going to explain something here briefly. Reece's Rainbow is a non-profit organization. To keep them functioning as such, they are completely dependent on donations to the Voice of Hope fund. As stated on Reece's Rainbow's website..
Are here again!
22’39 That’s what you said
Fri-AM: 1:00, 3000' ~ 2nd Flatiron+Green Mt.
Run your knife lengthwise around each avocado and its pit. Twist the avocado and pull it apart. Carefully tap your knife into the pit, twist, and remove. Scoop the flesh out of each half of and cut it into large chunks (you’ll later mash it a bit into smaller pieces).
Deriving its existence in itself, relishing on the slightest chime ;
Magical tool: Cup
Wheels car was attached to the
07 Black Money
Can you briefly summarise what the band has been up to since the release of your Split with Ten Speed Bicycle?
It's a wonder some of my characters even speak to me anymore.
PM calls for us to talk out our differences.
Akin to the Irish, when young and old French soldiers alike were heading into battle, ready to lay down their lives in wars that extended far beyond themselves as individuals, they had to fight to the bitter end for a cause they believed in. They fought for their families, they fought for their freedom, and most of all they fought for their wonderful country that they called their home.
(my dad got this for me when he went to a game, I think I was in the 3rd grade (when were trolls popular?))
* How does the Smart Quill Agent Recommendation Service work?
If you want to join in all you have to do is post on an Irish Short story during the week-or everyday if you like!-Send me a comment and a link and I will link back to you in a closing post or as I go along.
- Larger Tag, behind the Small Tag, from Tags, Bags, Boxes and More Cricut Cartridge cut at 3.84
“S-s-safe. Safe. Got-got it.”
